im a more happier person after discovering the i/p button ! 
but , if you 're looking for my opinion of the apex dvd player , i love it ! 
it practically plays almost everything you give it . 
for the price it is a well spent investment ! 
this is by far the nicest one , in so many ways . 
it 's very sleek looking with a very good front panel button layout , and it has a great feature set . 
its fast-forward and rewind work much more smoothly and consistently than those of other models i 've had . 
it plays alternate video formats ( vcds , svcds , cvds ) very well . 
and amazon.com has it for such a great price -- how can you go wrong ? 
what got me to buy was the reviewer that said it would play dvd-rs fill of files ( e. , mp3s ) . 
it sure does ! 
that 's a rare and valuable feature . 
another nice thing is that the unit has both optical and coax digital audio outputs , though the latter was not mentioned in the literature i 'd scanned before buying . 
at double-speed ( 2x forward speed ) , it still plays mp3s with sound -- they are pitch-corrected and smooth , but twice as fast ! 
update : the finish is more " mirror " than silver -- and i like it ! 
player works and looks great - if you can get the dvd 's to play . 
for the first few weeks , this player was everything i expected it to be , an affordable multi-format dvd player with a stylish slim case as advertised . 
i bought this apex 2600 dvd player for myself at christmas because it got good reviews as a good value for the money on a variety of different sites . 
i took it to my father 's house to play a tom jones concert dvd and he loved the player so much i gave it to him . 
have used it frequently and have had no problems . 
i liked this one enough to buy another . 
my dad also has an apex tv and it was another great value for the money . 
great quality picture and features . 
it looks great - and is loaded with features . 
the apex 2600 has been a steady performer for me . 
i bought mine in december of 2003 , and have had no real problems with it . 
( he had owned two apex dvd players , and was pleased with both of them . ) 
the fact that this model would play jpeg slideshows was a big plus for me as a visual artist , and i discovered by accident ( it is not mentioned anywhere in the literature ) that it will play mpeg1 files on a regular cd-r data disk without vcd formatting . 
while i would like to give it 3.5 stars instead of 4 , i gave it a 4 because it has run well for me during the time i have owned it . 
nothing has broken on it , and it plays all the dvds i have . 
we tried it out christmas night and it worked great . 
even viewed cds full of jpgs . 
well , it was nice while it lasted . 
this dvd player plays raw mpeg2 and mpeg1 videos , jpeg , wma , cdr / cdrw / dvdr / dvdrw , and of course plays dvd movies from uk. i love the aiff , progressive scan feature . 
because of it 's hidden features ( no macrovision , non-regional ) i keep this baby around to watch non-american region dvd 's . 
the cool thing about the ad-2600 it plays alot of different file like mp3 , wma cds , jpeg and kodak picture cds , dvd 's , dvd - / + r 's . 
it 's not a listed feature but , the one thing that sold the unit is that it plays mpeg video . 
i find this to be a great feature . 
i 've tried playing all of these discs and they all play great . 
for the money apex machines have good features . 
it 's low profile , space saving design looks nice . 
i find the apex ad-2600 to be a great buy . 
i was surprised to find that not only could this dvd player play mpeg2 format which allowed me to stack 2 movies on a dvd , but it also was able to play vob files which i created with smart ripper . 
the aff feature did a great job converting the letterbox to fill 3/4 of the screen and the image still looked normal . 
loved the slim design . 
audio is excellent . 
i am very pleased with the apex ad2600.it plays just about anything you put in the drawer . 
but , it seems to work so well now , that i do n't anticipate any problems with it . 
simple to use and hook up . 
the progressive scan option can be turned off easily by a button on the remote control which is one of the simplest and easiest remote controls i have ever seen or used . 
this is the best dvd player i 've purchased . 
this player has worked flawlessly for me and at this price , you can 't go wrong . 
well , this apex dvd player turned out great ! 
it plays basically every media i 've tested so far , even an old vcd that i ripped years ago and the rental dvd that could n't be played on my old $ 200 sharp player ! 
i have to say i 'm also pretty impressed by the user interface for playing jpeg , mp3 and mpeg files stored on cd-rs / dvds . 
i did not want to have high expectations for this apex player because of the price but it is definitely working out much better than what i would expect from an expensive high-end player . 
and the slim form-factor together with the mirror-like front panel sure makes the player look cool and pricey ! 
finally , amazon 's free shipping is really getting good , it took only 3 working days for the player to reach me ! 
for the most part this is a good dvd player . 
we are overall pleased with product . 
progressive scan player for a relatively low price ( although the better known manufacturers like toshiba , pioneer , and panasonic are now offering lower-priced progressive scan players as well ) . 
seems to read most dvds fine , and reads quietly ( i had a pioneer player that had fairly loud disc spin noise ) . 
also , i have not had trouble reading svcds that i created and vbr mp3 cds ( my old apex ad-1200 had trouble with these ) . 
output through component connections looks very good , on my non-hd tv . 
i checked out the amazon reviews and i 'm pleased to say mine worked , works , fine right out of the box . 
i like the auto fit feature = you can stretch widescreen dvd 's to normal . 
looks ok - very shiny chrome and mirrors . 
this thing plays everything i feed it . 
when i 1st tried it i found that it had no problem playing the more expensive dvd - r media disc 's that other players would play but to my surprise was able to play cheep media that i had burned that i could n't get to work before in anything but the dvd burner itself that i had made the disc with . 
easy to use , small form factor , and looks good to boot . 
it does n't smell like burning plastic when you open the drive . 
without a doubt the finest looking apex dvd player that i 've seen . 
excellent picture quality - on par with my pioneer , panasonic , and jvc players . 
remote : you can stand it on end ( harder to lose ) , and it 's far better designed than the 1100s . 
unlike some of the other people who received a " lemon " , my dvd player came in perfect working condition . 
as a whole , the dvd player has a sleek design and works fine . 
this player seems to work fine with everything else . 
it 's running great for all the dvds i have and rented . 
apex ad-2600 runs all the dvd media including dvd + r/rw and dvd-r / rw ( unlike sony or panasonic - one supports only + r/rw and another supports - r/rw ) . 
i think , apex is the best dvd player you can get for the price . 
most of them are already switched to apex and they are happy . 
this has so many capabilities that you 'll always have room for new technologies as they evolve . 
i use this with a home theater system and it 's amazing how it sounds , the picture clarity is unmatched ! 
so much packed in a small case and very affordable ! 
it 's a compact , attractive machine and was easy to set up . 
basic usage is easy , but the remote has a lot of buttons that i have n't used . 
so far , we 've only used this player a few times to watch movies and it has worked fine . 
the picture is clear , bright and sharp and the sound is good . 
it works well enough ( so far ) for me to be satisfied with it , and it 's possible that i 'm missing something . 
i 'm giving this player cautious recommendation . 
there are a lot of things i like about it . 
received apex dvd and the picture was great when set up with s connector . 
so far the dvd works so i hope it does n't break down like the reviews i 've read . 
amazon was wonderful about picking it up the next day and paying for the return shipping . 
retraction : said mine had silver plate : it does have display . 
it works great . 
the unit seems to play all formats that i have put in it ( jpeg , kodak pic 's and dvd-r ) i have read other reviews and some good and soom not so good , but my feeling at this time is " two thumbs up " ! 
it seems to be working fine , but we 've not used it all that much . 
the player looked good right out of the box , offering lots of features and good styling . 
amazon is awaesome ! 
for the price , it 's a very nice dvd player . 
it does play a wide range of formats as advertised which is very nice . 
and so far have not had any problems with dvds not being able to play . 
i only wanted something to play dvds on but this machine has all these other features that i probably will never use but it 's nice to know that there 're there . 
the machine is very light and slim and fits nicely into my tv stand . 
i 've had no problems at all so far and i 'm very happy . 
besides the one problem , this machine is amazing ! 
it plays everything , even vcd 's . 
i will never use all the " whistles and bells " this machine is capable of . 
but for what i do use it is perfect . 
owner 's manual has substandard troubleshooting guide . 
the dvd player is fine . 
of course , i was hesitant given the price , but i 've been extremely impressed since receiving it , and bought a second one as a christmas present for my parents . 
the picture is perfect , although i 'm not watching on an hdtv . 
but , dollar for dollar , this dvd player is probably the best out there . 
the player does seem to play dvds adequately enough . 
there were a few attractive features , such as the small size and the layout of the remote . 
i looked into buying an inexpensive dvd player that had more than the standard set of features and this item seemed to be the best in that category . 
i just hooked it up and everything seemed to be going fine . 
still , i was willing to overlook those things as this unit looks sleek and has a myriad of features ! 
this is probably one of the few dvd players at $ 40 that can play almost everything you throw at it . 
ability to play most discs - i tried dvd , vcd , dvd-r , audio cd and it played all 
good looks 
this is wonderful to have for your first dvd player . 
i brought it for my sister in college and she loves it ! 
apex is the best cheap quality brand for dvd players . 
also , very light and portable . 
it will read and play all cd audio disc . 
i have shopped with amazon before and have been very happy with their performance thus far . 
it plays original dvds and cds and plays mp3s and jpegs . 
also , it was only $ 39.99 ( after rebate ) with free shipping and no tax so overall it is a decent player . 
good quality video . 
it did play a dvd-r which was unplayable in my older philips machine . 
mixed bag i guess but the price was right . 
this is the third apex product i 've bought and they continue to impress for the price . 
the build quality feels solid , it does n't shake or whine while playing discs , and the picture and sound is top notch ( both dts and dd5.1 sound good ) . 
it looks really sleek and stylish , and does everything it claims . 
i tried as bunch of different formats to see if it would play and it did . 
i am very pleased with this product and the price to match and have n't had any problems . 
there are really easy directions for setup and fiddling around with the picture , zoom etc . 
so sit back , relax and brag to all your friends who paid a mountain of money for a dvd player that can 't do half the things this one can , and for a fraction of the price ! 
noiseless , lightweight and oh yeah . 
works great ! 
silverish color really adds a special touch . 
it plays just about any format ( check before you buy if it plays yours . ) 
either way , can 't go wrong with this price . 
i am really impressed by this dvd player . 
for instance , i made several back-ups of my dvd movies using dvd-r ( w ) and + r ( w ) and it plays the dvds . 
no matter the format . 
i recently purchased the canon powershot g3 and am extremely satisfied with the purchase . 
the camera is very easy to use , in fact on a recent trip this past week i was asked to take a picture of a vacationing elderly group . 
they fired away and the picture turned out quite nicely . ( as all of my pictures have thusfar ) . 
a few of my work constituants owned the g2 and highly recommended the canon for picture quality . 
i 'm easily enlarging pictures to 8 1/2 x 11 with no visable loss in picture quality and not even using the best possible setting as yet ( super fine ) . 
bottom line , well made camera , easy to use , very flexible and powerful features to include the ability to use external flash and lense / filters choices . 
i 'd highly recommend this camera for anyone who is looking for excellent quality pictures and a combination of ease of use and the flexibility to get advanced with many options to adjust if you like . 
this is my first digital camera , and what a ' toy ' it is ! 
just a little overview , powershot g3 is the flagship of canon 's powershot series and its an slr-like camera , its 4 megapixel and ( alsmost ) full manual control gives the pictures a touch of brilliance . 
whether you are a novice or an expert , its ease of use and functionality goes together . 
overall i 'm happy with my toy . 
in a word , " awesome " is how i would describe this camera . 
i wo n't go into the details here , as the online sites ( stevesdigicams , dpreviews ) go into great depth in their reviews , but i am very pleased with the features , the speed , the picture quality , the flexibility , the automation , and the functional conveniences this camera offers . 
with the automatic settings , i really have n't taken a bad picture yet . 
i am absolutely in awe of this camera , canon put enormous quality into the g3 . 
i bought my canon g3 about a month ago and i have to say i am very satisfied . 
i have taken hundreds of photos with it and i continue to be amazed by their quality . 
the g3 is loaded with many useful features , and unlike many smaller digital cameras , it is easy to hold steady when using slower shutter speeds . 
despite this minor disappointment , i highly recommend the canon g3 anyone who is serious about digital photography . 
i have only had this camera for one full day and i have to say that it is wonderful . 
the photo quality is amazing and i know i 'm going to have fun with all the features . 
1 ) slr like programming and exposure control gives you latitude to be creative , yet its progam and auto exposure settings provide excellent photos if you do n't want to bother with the settings . 
excellent range of metering options as well . 
it 's great to switch to spot metering and actually see it working on the lcd screen . 
2 ) 4mp is about right for the target market of this camera ( semi-serious amateur photographer ) 
3 ) 4x zoom is nice 
5 ) its focusing system is also very flexible . 
you can move the focus range to almost anywhere in the scene with the push of a button , and it has an on-screen manual focus mode that would be really helpful if shooting a scene that is tough to automatically focus . 
the camera has a wonderful set of features . 
the lcd screen pulls out and rotates in any direction for easy pictures . 
the optical zoom works great and the 14x digital zoom is a very nice addition although pictures at the highest digital zoom are a little blurry . 
the highest optical zoom pictures are perfect . 
i have not yet seen any of the usual problems with digital pictures ( purple fringing , etc ) so i am very pleased . 
the canon computer software used to download , sort , upload and manage your digital pictures on the computer is very nice and very easy to use . 
the menus are easy to navigate and the buttons are easy to use . 
it is a fantastic camera and well worth the price . 
recent price drops have made the g3 the best bargain in digital cameras currently available . 
advanced photobugs will find more creative control than imaginable . 
newbies will find the full auto setting will give them perfect pictures right out of the box . 
4 megapixels is enough for anybody and the photo quality is awesome . 
those used to 35mm cameras will find the g3 very comfortable and friendly to use . 
the extended zoom range and faster lense put it at the top of it 's class . 
i recommend unreservedly the powershot g3 to any potential buyer looking for a first-class digital camera at a reasonable price - there is no better camera out there - period ! 
it gives great pictures , the controls are easy to use , the battery lasts forever on one single charge , the software is very user-friendly and it is beautiful in it chrome casing . 
i began taking pics as soon as i got this camera and am amazed at the quality of photos i have took simply by using the auto mode . 
this camera has canon 's great colorimetry , plus what you see in the lcd is what you get . 
the prints are beautiful ! 
although canon 's batteries are proprietary , they last a really long time , recharge fairly quickly in the camera , plus if you want ' more power ' , you can even find a knockoff charger and spare batteries right here on amazon . 
this is a great camera for you ! 
the canon g3 gives tons of control for photo buffs but still has an " auto " mode that makes it very easy for the novice to use . 
i love having the option to manually control the f-stop , shutter speed and even focus . 
i was able to take great photos of the 4th of july fire works , and got some amazing shots of the kids playing with sparklers . 
but if you 've used a slr 35mm camera , the controls are very intuitive ! 
with a quick spin of the dial you can select shutter priority ( for high speed subjects ) , aperture priority ( for focal length ) or full program mode where the camera selects both for ideal photo quality . 
the manual mode is easy to use with fast access for the selection of shutter speed and aperture without having to fumble through menu options . 
this camera also has a great feel and weight to it . 
you feel like you are holding something of substance , not some cheap plastic toy . 
the more i work with it , the more i love it ! 
i did n't think i would find this quality and ease of use for under $ 1500 - i 'm thrilled with my purchase ! 
this is my first digital camera , and i am very pleased with it . 
seriously , this thing has everything that a pro or expert amateur could want . 
but at the same time , it takes wonderful pictures very easily in " auto " mode , so that even an average joe like me can use it ! 
four megapixels is great . 
it is a very amazing product . 
i highly recommend it . 
just received this camera two days ago and already love the features it has . 
takes excellent photos . 
night mode is clear as day . 
i have not played with all the features yet , but the camera is easy to use once you get used to it . 
overall it is the best camera on the market . 
a ) the picture quality ( color and sharpness of focusing ) are so great , it completely eliminated my doubt about digital imaging --- how could one eat rice one grain at a time : - ) ) 
i love this camera . 
took hundreds of pictures and they were great . 
great colors , pictures and white balance . 
has 4x optical zoom which is higher than any other in the same price range . 
when i took outdoor photos with plenty of light and the objects were n't moving , the photos were awesome . 
the camera was a marvel . 
it is versatile and seems to be one of the best . 
i chose the g3 because of its reputation for very high quality , clean images . 
what makes the focus-lock lag time something i can live with is the extreme depth of field obtainable with these point and shoot digicams at f8 . 
fortunately , the g3 has a hot shoe that can take an external flash , and fortunately for me , i already owned a one of the highest quality external flashes that money can buy : the metz 60 ct-4 . 
contrary to what ive read elsewhere , the g3 does sync at 1/250 of a second with third-party flashes , just as it does with the dedicated flashes from canon . 
what this plug-in reveals is the truly stunning quality of the raw g3 hardware . 
without any tweaking at all , if the exposure is accurate , the colors are as realistic as ive ever seen produced by film , and this is a raw image ! 
but at least youre starting with the most photorealistic images ive ever seen from a camera . 
i am stunned and amazed at the quality of the raw images i am getting from this g3 ( in conjunction with my professional flash system ) , and can easily put up with the cameras limitations , because ive never seen anything better within its resolution limits . 
i 've had this for 3 months now , and i am pleased with my decision . 
this is the perfect camera for a photo hobbiest who wants to have easy point and shoot ability as well . 
battery life , the drawback to most digital cameras , to quote k. reeves . 
manual functionality is excellent , downloading pictures is quick and a breeze , and the quality is astounding . 
the service from the supplier was exceptional . 
having used it for more than a month , i can say that it consistently produces topnotch photos . 
by cocking the shutter to the halfway position and getting the settings ready to shoot , i was able to produce excellent stopaction photos -- contrary to what other reviewers experienced . 
the camera is a dream to operate in automode , but also gives tremendous flexibility in aperture priority , shutter priority , and manual modes . 
i can 't write enough positive things about this great little camera ! 
but canon never fails to amaze . 
1 . the ability to selectively switch to raw format during record review gives you incredible more post-processing flexibility . 
2 . battery life is over 4.5 hours , compared to about 2.5 hours for the g2 or the 2 hours for most nikons . 
3 . the remote capture and fileviewer software bundled for photo capture is mind-blowing . 
4 . the shape of this device is a little squarer , without losing the weight which means better balance and less shaking while clicking . 
the light auto-correction is awesome . 
you could take a picture of a stone glinting in the sun and still avoid the shining glaze and get the contours right . 
8 . perhaps inspired by the canon 's factory white-correction settings ( which were found lacking and had to be altered by a user before the white edges from buildings etc could be cleaned out ) , the g3 has much sharper white offsets . 
overall , the g3 delivers what must be considered the best image quality of any current > 4 megapixel digicams , from a detail , tonal balance and color response point of view . 
this is quite simply the best you can ask for . 
4mp , 4x optical zoom , takes absolutely beautiful photos with detail that challenges all of the above 5mp cameras , easy to understand and use ( has a great swivel lcd screen ) , a lot of features and add-on options , comes with great software ( not to be overlooked ) , and last but by far not least , received my fiance 's stamp of approval ( two thumbs up ! ) 
the powershot g3 is a great camera . 
because it can help a so-so photographer take spectacular photos ! 
4 megapixels is plenty for all but pros , and you will not be disappointed with the results of this camera . 
it 's slightly lighter than the g2 and packed with even more features . 
this is my first digital camera and i could n't be happier . 
i love the quality of the pictures . 
they look fantastic . 
the canon g3 is perhaps the best 4mp camera out there . 
with canon , you get pictures that appear to be photos , not still camcorder shots . 
i love the eos based controls and easy menus . 
i bought it for my trip to beunos aires , and also used it at the iguazu falls , and could not have asked for more perfect performance ! 
this camera is worth every penny , and i highly recommend it ! 
another point of note : the battery life is incredible ! 
am i ever glad that i decided on this camera ! 
i 've only had it a week , but so far , everything about this camera is making me happy . 
very intuitive menus are a big plus on this camera . 
the standard battery include with the g3 is a camcorder battery that will allow me to take pictures all day without worrying about charging . 
the optical zoom is awesome , and the viewfinder reflects the settings of the zoom . 
the best 4 megapixel/4x optical zoom camera available and fairly easy to use . 
because this camera is beautiful . 
the g3 looks like a work of art ! 
its silver magnesium finish is stunning , and the sharp lines and excellent grip are better than any other camera i 've seen . 
i am very pleased with it so far . 
it is very simple to import via iphoto 2 and then move them to photoshop . 
i am quite happy with the camera . 
it comes with a clearly written manual and the learning curve is not too too steep . 
yes , i recommend it over the competition . 
best camera ever . from the image quality , color , function , i can say almost everything . 
this camera has a cool stitch pictures feature , to find out more just log on to canon 's website . 
first and foremost , it will take better pic 's than most film camera 's . 
this camera has none of these flaws and will be something you 'll use all the time . 
however , for a $ 600 - $ 800 budget , i think this camera is an excellent choice . 
it has a beautiful design , lots of features , very easy to use , very configurable and customizable , and the battery duration is amazing ! 
also , the display is " hinged " and it can be placed in a myriad of positions , or to protect it against any damage . 
another good thing is that this camera seems to introduce much less noise in dark places than others i 've seen . 
i have owned this camera for a short time and would n't give it up for anything . 
it surpasses my greatest expectations in a 4mp camera .. 
in general it is easy to use and well laid out . 
it makes up for this by being extremely easy to use with well laid out controls that can be learned quickly . 
the g3 has most if not all of the features that you would want from a semi-pro / pro slr with a good range of manual options for those who know something about photography . 
in the hands of someone who does n't , it will yield good results on idiot program / auto mode . 
the functionality on this camera is mind-blowing . 
canon have packed a lot in here and the options and controls are easy to use and logically laid out . 
learning how to use it will not take very long . 
the image quality is excellent . 
range of functions - as indicated above - it has something for everyone : point and shoot power plus advanced functions for those who are serious about photography . 
this is by far the finest camera in its price and category i have ever used . 
the macro works great for medical photographs and the auto mode is terrific for point and shoot . 
this camera is closest to perfect than any other digicam that is 4-5 megapixel . 
i 'm glad canon decided to keep the 4mp resolution and improved upon it with new technology ; 
in terms of the shots taken , this camera is insanely great ! 
the pictures are fabulous and their is a ( short ) learning curve to it ; there are tons of features i have n't even gotten to . 
i 've been pleased with the picture quality and durability in snow , car , boat and wind . 
the camera 's a work of art / science -- that 's understood . 
it takes great pictures , operates quickly , and feels solid . 
everything else about the camera is great . 
if you strictly use the lcd and not the view finder , i highly recommend the camera . 
and so far , i 've been very pleased . 
the larger lens of the g3 gives better picture quality in low light , and the 4-times optical zooms gets you just that much closer . 
the moveable lcd screen is great . 
the tiny ( postage-stamp sized ) remote unit is wonderful : not only does it trigger the shutter , it can also be used to zoom and review pictures . 
the hot shoe flash attachment allowed me to buy and use a sophisticated flash unit : 
i needed three batteries to keep myself going with the s330 , but the battery in the g3 is a real powerhouse : 
the g3 has a different type of battery charging system from the smaller canon cameras : the battery needs to be charged while in the camera , but the charging system also enables you to use the camera while plugged in without running down the battery . 
i have yet to try using all of the adjustment options : shutter priority , aperature priority , light metering adjustments , etc. , but all controls are well thought out and and the manual is relatively clear . 
i was worried that 4 megapixel photos would download more slowly , but there 's no difference in working with the files . 
i 've now had the camera for two months and i 'm even more pleased with it . 
very comfortable camera , easy to use , and the best digital photos you 're going to get at this price . 
i 've been using the g3 for about six weeks and it has proven itself to be all that it 's advertised . 
all-in-all , i believe this is arguably the best non-slr digital camera on the market . 
canon 's optics are better and i believe their processing algorithms are also better . 
simply , the canon g3 is the best digital camera out there today at this price point . 
the battery life of this camera is twice that of the nikon 5000 and is better than anything else i 've seen . 
even with these shortcomings , i still think it is the best digital camera available under $ 1200 . 
definetely a great camera . 
proven canon built quality and lens . 
feels solid in hand . 
We really enjoyed shooting with the Canon PowerShot SD500. 
It has an exterior design that combines form and function more elegantly than any point-and-shoot we've ever tested. 
A Digic II-powered image-processing system enables the SD500 to snap a limitless stream of 7-megapixel photos at a respectable clip, its start-up time is tops in its class, and it delivers decent photos when compared to its competition. 
The SD500 rivals the Canon G6 in image quality. 
This camera is truely superb.
The startup time, quality of pictures and videos is outstanding.
They say that they are the best pictures they have ever see from a compact. 
 I went out and got the Canon today. 
I've taken about hundred shot with the Canon, in varying lighting situations, all in auto mode, and not one blurry picture!!! 
I did not conduct a rigorous test, but just took some identical shots in identical lighting with both cameras, and the Canon won hands down. 
Sharper pictures. 
The Canon is very small, definitely pocket size, but still easy to hold firmly. 
It powers up quickly, so you won't miss that quick shot. 
Good image quality. 
All I have to say is that the pics I get with my SD500 are both rich and color and high in detail, the user interface is awesome, the battery charger is tiny and super light and SD cards are relatively cheap and getting cheaper all the time.
Camera is a paper weight. 
I have been very impressed with my purchase of the SD500 I bought it at the beginning of the month as the ultimate pocket camera and have shot 300 images so far with it.
The pictures are tack sharp, colors are vivid, and at 7 mega pixels the quality is plenty high to manipulate and crop images to your hearts desire. 
Powerup is quick, and you can even set your favorite image to display for a second or so as it turns on. 
I have especially enjoyed the 640x480 mode, while not a replacement for a dedicated video camera, its quality easily surpasses that of my old Hi-8 camera and is perfect for quick clips of things that still images just dont describe (max 8 mins at 640 30fps on a one gig card). 
Audio is mono and fairly acceptable, quiet also with little distortions. 
The battery life is not that of the Casio's but its good and your going to get better pictures in my opionion with the battery life youve got. 
Glad to see the Ed. revised the previous statements regarding image quality. 
My SD500 focuses flawlessly, does not "whine" during video, and my pictures are razor sharp. 
This camera is bulletproof. 
start up is so quick ?
you can take pictures seconds after you turn the camera on...literally! 
big lcd screen - at least for me, 2" is enough
great picture quality - in automatic mode, quality is great. 
when you learn how to change some settings, you can make the quality even better 
digital zoom is clear too...say you used all 3x optical zoom, try to do digital zoom then...just try not to shake the camera at all and you'll still get a clear good quality picture
great video clip quality for a digital camera - so much better than my old one (Canon A60(?)...the 2.0 megapixel one). 
i connected my camera to the tv and played some video clips and for a digital camera to take such good quality clips, i give it 5/5 stars =) oh and btw, while you take video clips, you can zoom it too! (digital zoom only though)...but still...(my old one can't do that...you have to zoom it first if you want then take the video clip.)
photo stitch (merge pictures to create a panoramic one..even my old one can do this and it's really cool to have it now still)
turn the camera on while pressing the button (or is it the menu button? i have to check again =)) and it'l show you the time and date. 
i highly recommend this camera to anybody looking for a compact camera that can take good quality pictures. 
if you'll only read the whole manual, you'll find out even more cool features and you'll learn how to manipulate the quality you want to achieve and all those modes will make sense after reading 
it's such a great camera! i think it really was worth the investment =)
if you haven't noticed, they designed it so that you can also take vertical pictures when you do the self-timer. 
they made the other end of the camera flat so you can put the camera upright on a flat surface if you don't like to take the usual horizontal pictures using the self-timer.
I bought this camera two days ago, and I'm very pleased to say that it has been worth the money. 
If you on the other hand always use automatic settings (and not manual) you should be just fine, as the camera features some of the best automatic settings I have ever seen.
All in all, this is the camera for you if you can spare the extra cost in price. 
Having the Digic II chip helps a lot. 
This camera takes amazing pictures and its size cannot be beat. 
I still can't believe how fast it starts up. 
I take a lot of pictures and this camera is my first choice. 
I still have my s70 because I like the wider lens sometimes, but in general, if you are looking for a small camera with the whole package, the sd500 is the only one you should buy. 
I love the rounded edges now, fits so much better in a pocket, jeans or suit. 
I tell you now, after lot of shooting in many different situations, this camera is amazing. 
The size of the camera is perfect. 
Fits comfortably in my inside jacket pocket or in my pants pocket. 
there was no compromise this little camera does amazing things. 
I like to take pictures when I Go out at night and perhaps some people would complain that noise levels are high at higher iso's but I don't really care that much, i think it gives the pictures a certain real-life quality. 
The flash is surprisingly good and even the video quality is excellent. 
I'd be happy to talk to anyone about this camera. 
This camera is an excellent choice for an ultracompact, take anywhere device and boasts an outstanding movie mode to boot. 
The instruction manuals and documentation are excellent so that the learning curve will be much less steep.
I've only had this camera for a few days, but it's been great. 
The photo quality is amazing. 
it's fast, feels great in your hand and looks great too. 
I've printed several photos and the prints look as good as the screen views.
As any digital camera owner knows is that when you go to take a picture of a moving object to expect some blurring but with some preliminary testing we had somone move there hands back and forth under the lense and another person take the picture and suprisingly a crystal clear image apeared on the decently sized screen. 
another thing i like about this camera is the way that you can swap colors around and the impressive video quality i would advise any person in the market for a camera to pay the little extra on the hefty $500 price tag and get a quality camera.
Moreover, apart from the plastic cable cover, the camera has a nice, solid feel about it, and it's so tiny, I take it with me wherever I go. 
As it turns out, this is an awesome camera! 
However, this ultracompact allows the photographer to personalize his or her shooting preferences through a variety of preset and user definable modes. 
The SD500 software install was seamless and the product documentation is very detailed. 
Bottom line, this camera will give you a lot of bang for the buck!
I don't know why CNET says there is a problem with focus, I have all my pictures sharp and high quality. 
Very good "every day" camera. Fits nicely in the pocket of my jeans and takes quality photos.
If you want a sharp looking, fast digital camera and you don't need or want manual controls, then this is the camera for you! 
 am so glad I bought this camera. 
All the good reviews for the SD500 are true. 
The view finder shows crystal clear pictures that will look even better when you get them to the computer. 
The included software removes any red eye easily. 
if you are looking for a small camera to throw in your pocket, take great pics and video, get the SD500. 
This is overall the best point and shoot camera I've used. 
Placement of the buttons and software user interface is near perfect. 
I also tend to like the sliding cover/on switch found on many compact PS cameras since it's much faster and easier to power on if you need to take that instant shot. 
overall build quality, good macros-results, impressive video-quality, good pictures with flash (good colours, sharp results), excellent auto white balance.
Could be better to be a perfect camera (and some competitors do some of this better): purple fringing, details in high-light area, noise over ISO100, red-eyes, (few)processing artefacts, (few)loss of some details especially of the hairs of peoples in low light, automatic autofocus, whizing while video-playback, better video comression (smaler viedo-files), more manual controls, longer lasting battery, indicator for battery, better protection of the LCD, less weight. 
When the overall image quality (especially natural colours, details, natural looking of the pictures) is the most important thing, then this camera ist top notch and very impressive. 
In low light with flash I found it clear better then the sony P200 (too much red, colours overall not as natural but fewer red-eyes). 
I found best results in most situation with manual/center auto focus, manual mode, ISO 100 (shorter aperture-time, so more often sharper images as with ISO 50), auto white balance (auto white balance is better than of the other canon cameras I have and they already do very-well).
I upgraded from a very small 3.2 mpxl camera to this camera with great results. 
Good color and very little needed to correct photos on Paintshop Pro. 
Neat feature for self-timer allows you to record two different warnings. 
The manual is excellent. 
Also, multiple picture feature is very, very fast.
Very fast powerup and great speed when taking multiple pictures. 
Perfect size! Beats the competition by leaps and bounds. 
I am impressed with this camera inside and out.
I love the camera.
This camera is perfect for the person who wants a compact camera that produces excellent photos in just about any situation. 
The camera responce is VERY quick. 
I have a Canon A 70 , and now this SD500, its amazing, how this little camera produces, such great pics, it even brings out ur pimples on the face. 
And the video quality is amazing. 
And it fits right in my pocket much easier than my old S30. 
I want to start off saying that this camera is small for a reason.
I'm in high school, and this camera is perfect for what I use it for, carrying it around in my pocket so I can take pictures whenever I want to, of my friends and of funny things that happen.
I'd say that this camera is perfect.
OK, not quite everything...but this camera is so compact that you will have it by your side when you need it.
I bought this camera for the same reason many of you are considering it, or have already bought it--it's size.
It is amazingly small, it's hard to believe all that has been packed into this camera.
it is so small that I am able to keep it in my pocket, and I don't have to fear that it will get ruined in my pocket because it is so durable.
There is also a small covering for the lens, so you need not worry that the lens will get scratched.
The picture quality surprised me, when I first saw this camera I saw how small it was an instantly assumed that the picture quality would not be good--but I was wrong!
The picture quality of this camera is outstanding (taking its' size and price into consideration).
The focus is great, though, if you are not taking a macro shot.
I have come across many other beginner cameras that I prefer over this camera, but the thing you have to keep in mind about this camera is the size.
If you are just looking for something to keep with you at all times, then this is a great camera choice.
after considering my needs further and researching the marketplace, I decided on the s100.
It has given me zero problems, and the more I use it, the better I become at taking advantage of its strengths.
This wonderfully small digital camera produces fantastically good pictures printed on any decent photo-quality printer (with photo quality paper).
It will not replace your high-end 35mm SLR but it's a great toy to keep near you at all times for snapshots.
This IS the best camera you can have for digital images if you want to:
Take quick pictures with excelent resolution
Hate to wait between shots
Download it fast to your computer
Have a great and easy to use bundled software
Travel with it without knowing you have it in your pocket
FYI, Battery doesn't die if you don't use LCD
The color and light I captured with this camera on a 12-day trip to Turkey (gorgeous vividly colored ceramic tiles inside darkened mosques) were far superior to anything I've ever gotten with a traditional 35-mm film camera.
I love this camera.
I don't believe this camera is still available. But if you can find one, you might like to get it.
It's still one of the smallest 2MP digital cameras on the market, and absolutely one of the best-built most stylish cameras ever.
I am very pleased with my purchase.
I've been incredibly happy with this camera.
This camera is great if you're used to a high-end SLR.
It's overkill for simple snapshots, unless you've got way too much money to blow.
Exposure compensation in 1/3 stop increments (I leave it set on +1/3 stop to brighten up the default exposure, which goes a bit dark for my taste).
Slow-syncro flash, macro/infinity mode, etc.
The SS body is wonderful, feels high-quality.
It's the same body as the popular ELP2 APS camera (take a look at a standard credit card from your wallet and you'll have an idea of the front profile!).
I discovered that the camera has a manual mode that gives you total control over exposure, white balance, flash (red eye, person against bright background, flash on, flash off, flash automatic).
It fits in your pocket.
The panorama setting is unbelieveable !
You have the option to have the flash automatic or off.
The new Canon s300 is 33% larger and 26% heavier than the S100.
It has one more resolution of 1024X768 and a "Normal" compression mode.  And, it has the 3X zoom.
But it takes gorgeous pictures for a 2.1 MP camera.
I love this camera!
I got this camera for an unbelievably low price at amazon.
I would recommend this camera unequivocally!
I got this camera for an unbelievably low price at amazon.
I would recommend this camera unequivocally!
But this DOES work even if you turn off the LCD viewing -- great  battery saver.
A great camera, but here are some points which I don't notice in most of the reviews here, which may be of concern especially to the more advanced amatuer:
I purchased the Elph s100 mainly because I thought it was cool.
The camera does a great job with exposure and prints made with my professional printer looks great (not as good as prints from my pro digital camera, but still VERY good).
But I was ready to upgrade and when I discovered that Canon  was going to come out with an even smaller digital camera with a higher  resolution, I had to have the S100.
This is my second digital camera, but I'm much more impressed with the Canon S100 Digital Elph than I EVER was with my Kodak DC240.
This camera is so light and tiny that I literally carry it everywhere with me, which is great considering I'm an artist and like to capture interesting items for future painting.
The software that comes with the Digital Elph is very nice and intuitive.
The PhotoStitch software is very cool if you want to do any 360 degree panorama shots.
Other than that, I love this camera.
The pictures are uniformly excellent and color rendering is perfect.
The good:  Small size; durable-seeming metal case; easy to use; visually distinctive; good picture quality; fast USB connection; mostly intuitive operation; really cool PhotoStitch software that knits pictures together to give wide panoramas.
If compact size is your highest priority in a 2-megapixel camera, the Canon PowerShot S100 Digital Elph is a standout choice and aptly named for its diminutive design.
The S100's image quality rates in the middle of its class, but it can still be a reasonable choice for students, families, or small businesses looking for an ultra-portable camera that weighs less than half a pound with media and battery pack.
I purchased this camera before it went on sale, and while I wouldn't have minded keeping the extra $$$, it was definitely worth it.
I have been absolutely, completely satisfied with the product and its capabilities.
This is a great product, and Canon has done an excellent job.
I received this little jewel as a gift and I can honestly say Iabsolutely love it.
I give this product five stars for its usability,performance, expandability, and definitely looks!
First, I have to say that I have NEVER had the slightest problem with this camera or the software.
The software has been installed on Windows 95, 98, 2000 and XP and I haven't had any problems with it.
The camera is solid, performs well, takes good pictures, and the battery lasts pretty long if you disable the LCD viewfinder.
They are razor sharp, the color balance is perfect, and the focus is great.
I must say, I think this is the coolest camera I've ever  owned!
First, it really is tiny; the size of a pack of cigarettes, maybe  a scooch deeper.
Second, it is  incredibly easy to use.
I just went on a quick photo shoot in NYC's  Central Park today, and what a bunch of beautiful photos I took, if I do  say so myself (and I do!)
The camera is as easy to use as a point and  shoot, and with instant review on the LCD screen, you can retake any  flubbed shots on the spot.
The two-times optical zoom operates smoothly  and quietly, and lo and behold, a two-piece shutter-like cap automatically  slides closed over the lens when you turn the camera off.
I also had no  problems installing or running the camera software on my PC.
At any rate, if you have been interested in  digital photography but the price and confusion have held you back,  consider the Canon S100 Digital Elph.
It really is the perfect travel  camera, plus it offers the convenience of digital photography.
Really like it, easy to use, great images, very intuitive, fits in my jacket pocket.
I was looking for a compact, rugged (I carry it hiking, skiing, boating, etc) camera which is easy to use.
I wanted standard memory expansion (CF cards), macro mode, and if possible, a waterproof housing (for kayaking).
Even with the waterproof housing it is small.
The lens retracts and has its own metal cover so you don't need to fuss with a lens cap.
The metal housing seems very rugged.
The macro mode works well, although it takes some practice since the camera doesn't clearly indicate when it can't focus.
The white-LED backlit LCD is very bright and crisp, even in sunlight, and relatively easy on the battery.
The panorama modes are wonderful.
It's so small and light, even with a spare battery, you really can take it anywhere.
In auto mode anyone can use it as a point and shoot camera.
The manual modes give you a lot of control over exposure and white balance (but there is no manual focus or manual exposure).
There are better cameras but none anywhere near as light and compact.
1- Small.
VERY smal.
I've had a lot of cameras, but this one is ACTUALLY being used, and not stored in a desk: it's allways in my shist pocket.
2- Excellent picture quality and so simple to use!!!
4- Looks great.
Silver metal case -NOT PLASTIC.
5- Excelent software package.
6- Small but very clear TFT screen.
Don't care about sunlight: it's TFT.
7- 360 panoramic pictures are a very big deal.
I was looking for something that wasn't too complicated to use and to help the pics I post on Ebay show more detial.
This camera is great, wonderfully small, and has attactive hi-tech casing.
Very easy to use for someone like me who's just hopping on the digital camera bandwagon.
The controls are easy to understand and big enough that they are easy to see and use.
The optical and digital zooms combine to give an effective 4x zoom.
This is enough capacity and capability to do a complete household inventory, for example.
So, why the small Digital Elph, rather than one of the other cameras with better resolution or picture quality? size[+2]After getting one for Christmas from Amazon, I'm now a believer:  The Digital Elph is truly the world's smallest digital camera that shoots great pictures.
I've had this camera just over 2 years and it takes pretty good pictures.
The size is tiny, which I love.
This camera is so easy to use!
All the features are incredibly intuitive, even for a novice like me.
The pictures are beautiful, and the camera is so small you can carry it anywhere.
I, as many others, have waited for many years for the convergence of price, features, size and ease of use to hit that happy center point.
I bought this little guy a few weeks back, and I have to saythat I never had so much fun with a new toy as this.
You willdefinitly appreciate the small size.
while , there are flaws with the machine , the xtra gets five stars because of its affordability . 
it is the most bang-for-the-buck out there . 
like it 's predecessor , the quickly revised nx , this player boasts a decent size and weight , a relatively-intuitive navigational system that categorizes based on id3 tags , and excellent sound ( widely known to be better than ipod - not surprising considering the number of years creative has been in the audio peripheral business ) . 
the xtra improves upon the zen nx with a larger , now-blue backlit screen , which is infinitely better . 
i chose this one because from what i read , it was the best deal for the money . 
another reason i got it is because you can put wma files on it . 
the software is great . 
transfering is easy , the software makes everythig pretty easy . 
even the battery life is great - it advertises 14 hours , it 's actually a little less but still good . 
they player 's interface itself is also very easy to use . 
get it , it 's woth every penny ! ! 
i 've had it for a week now , do n't regret the purchase one bit , and i never leave home without it . 
software is easy to use ( although redhat software is better , but costs money ) 
much cheaper than i-pod good looking player ( beautiful blue back-lit screen ) if you 've read about the player , some have complained about the lack of a viewing hole for the face when the case is on , but this is good because the face does n't get damaged / scratched fast transfer rate 
the zen xtra sounds great with good headphone and well recored mp3s . 
at 8 ounces it is pretty light but not as light as the ipod . 
the battery is replaceable ( a real plus ) and there is a leather case ( another real plus ) . 
so far the software for the pc works easily . 
by the way , it looks nice also . 
it 's worth it . 
my two main requirements were longer battery life and lower price : i found both . 
the controls are on the side instead of on the front , which i like , because that 's where my thumb is when i hold the thing ! 
the scroll wheel is a big improvement over the ipod touchpad . 
the included leather pouch is a big plus : it actually protects the unit well , something a lot of ' carrying cases ' fail to do with other audio devices . 
other plusses : changable battery , loads of presets for environments , decent construction , still quite small and light despite being slightly bigger than an ipod . 
overall : small , sounds great , and less expensive than apple 's overpriced ipod ! 
( batteries last longer too ! ) 
the creative labs zen xtra has all the features the i-pod has and if you get if from amazon your only going to pay $ 300 for this great player . 
i 've had it for about 2 weeks and it 's the best player i 've seen , and used , ever . 
the music is easy to get to ( all of the menus are easy to understand despite what alot of i-pod owners say ) and if you know how to search for an artist by name online , then you can do the same with the zen . 
the screen is very easy to read and the blue light is bright enough to read at night , but dim enough so it does n't blind you when you stare too long . 
all in all this a great player that blows the i-pod away , with easy to use and understand features , software that is simple to understand and use , and a great sound ( which is all that matters in a mp3 player ) . 
it 's a very intuitive program . 
i had no problems following their installation instructions . 
the menus are very easy to navigate . 
the other controls are all very easy to use . 
it has several play options , one of the best is an option to shuffle , based on all or a certain playlist . 
it also costs a lot less than the ipod . 
the earbuds that come with it are n't that bad . 
they 're pretty comfortable , stay in place and deliver a decent audio quality . 
this is a good deal for music and data storage . 
on the positive side , the sound of the player is pretty good , once you have everything configured . 
i have n't had time to really push this player to the limit , but audio aspects on the nomad are satisfactory , as should be expected from creative labs . 
when it came down to it , the price on this player is hard to beat . 
other than that this thing is great ... 
zennx 's replaceable battery was the deciding factor in my purchase of zennx over ipod . 
the zennx will keep running for the price of a replacement battery , just like any other battery-powered appliance . 
i love my new nomad , its great ! 
for some this might be a problem , but for the price of a 30 gig ipod , you can get a 60gb nomad , the ipod simply pales in comparison . 
the software is very easy to use , and within 30 minutes of opening my box , i was out and about listening to any one of my 80 cds . 
the free ( i didnt know they still did that ) carrying case is really protective , and to me its the only accessory you need ( except good headphones ) . 
but if you want a great deal and a great mp3 player , get the nomad . 
best electronic i 've bought since i was born . 
so easy to set up , had some problems with my archos . 
just easily drag and drop files into the nomad explorer and from there you easily alter id tags and sort your music according to your liking , by artist , song title , genre , etc. 
not only is it functional and runs super smooth & fast , but it is also eye candy . 
very sleek & stylish as well as the screen options and visuals it has . 
the leather case it comes with is pretty nice , similar to a pda style case and does hold and protect it perfectly . 
all the buttons & neccessary lil ' gadgets are on the sides of the player which is nice for when you are holding it in the palm of your hand . 
the sound quality is also nice ... after i hooked up my sony headphones instead of those factory earbuds it comes with . 
lots of sound options , has an equalizer almost like winamp with the options . 
navigation is so smooth and finding files is a cinch . 
also navigating while playing music is a plus unlike my previous player . 
oh , and the screen saver feature is pretty sweet ^ _ ^ 
another plus in my book , no file limits ! 
i have over 2000 files in my playlist at the moment and the random does a nice job mixing it up . 
i am quite happy having over 10 gigs of music stored on this baby as well as a few gigs of media files in the data folder . 
i really have no complaints over this unit . 
i really do recommend this to anyone in need of a new player . 
i have no complaints with this mp3 player . 
getting files onto it is quick and painless . 
then sorting the files is easy as pie . 
and it holds sooooo much music and audio files . 
my music demands are pretty intense and this handles those demands without problems . 
the battery is nice . 
the lcd screen was very large and readable . 
compared to everything else in this category , this is most definately the best bang for the buck . 
i gave the zen 5 stars because it 's excellent for the class that it is in and it 's not really appropriate to rate it based on players in a different class . 
sound quality was the same between the two , but the zen did have more sound adjustments with the normal eax features . 
i love this player . 
i love this player and would probably go with creative labs again . 
the software was great , as long as you have an adminstrative user account ( windows xp ) . 
anyway , this player is a great deal and i really love it . 
way less expensive than the ipod . 
i find it pretty easy to use ... and unlike the remote interface for the audigy 2 nx ( on the pc ) .. . 
not counting the time i spent editing the songs ( i suppose i should 've done it anyway on my pc ) the transfer was pretty painless . 
bought the 30gb xtra a couple of weeks ago , and so far it has been excellent . 
i still have over 19gb left , and already have over 200 cd 's on it . 
both are very easy to learn & use , and intuitive enough for even a novice . 
ripping & transferring tunes is basic , and pretty fast ( even on a 1.1 usb ) . 
people also have complained about the case not having a window , but that 's not really a big deal to me either -- the case is sturdy and offers very good protection . 
it 's easy enough to pop it open to see what song you 're listening to . 
the sound quality is excellent ( and i 'm fussy with that stuff ) , the unit looks cool , screen is bright and easy to read , and the replaceable battery means a major advantage over the ipod ( besides the price , but everyone knows that ) . 
you of course have some good customization options with the unit as well ( sound presets , navigating options , playlists , etc ) . 
all other buttons are pretty sensitive to touch and work well . 
but i 've already emailed creative tech support about it , and gotten timely responses - they will fix it for me if necessary .. . 
it still fits in the palm of your hand , and it 's not heavy . 
bottom line ... great product , unbeatable price . 
i just received my 40gb zen xtra yesterday and i 'm extremely pleased with it . 
the setup and transfer process was cake for me . 
now that i have all my music on it there has n't been any more problems . 
the screen is large and bright and has all the info i need where i need it . 
the eax mode that keeps the volume at the same level for any song will come in handy when i take my holiday plane rides . 
all in all though i 'm very happy with my new mp3 player . 
i purchased the nomad jukebox zen xtra 40gb and it is fantastic ! 
i found using the supplied mediasource software very easy . 
ripping your songs and creating playlists could n't be any easier . 
i found using mediasource to load your songs to the nomad jukebox to be much easier and faster than using windows explorer . 
being a creative product the playback quality is unbeatable . 
when i played back a symphony orchestra you would swear that you were seated dead center in front of the orchestra - it 's that good ! 
the sound quality with jazz and pop music is equally superior . 
actually using the nomad jukebox is easy and uncomplicated . 
finding a particular song ( s ) or album on the nomad jukebox is fast and easy . 
the high resolution screen is easy to read and has a backlight . 
i can highly recommend this product because of its ease of use ( hardware and software ) , playback quality and value for the price . 
just bought one & i 've enjoyed it to date . 
nice palm sized unit , somewhat bigger then the ipod but not an issue if you 're not going to try & jog with it or something . 
all reviews i 've seen seem to indicate that the creative mp3 jukeboxes have the best sound quality of these 2nd generation jukeboxed ( ipod , archos , dell , samsung ) . 
the eax settings are somewhat superfluous but not really a negative . 
- great value 40gb vs 10 gb ipod for the price 
- best in class sound 
- large easy readable screen 
working for 10 hours with it on " shuffle " totally rocks ! ! 
i love it ! ! 
i had no problems setting up the software and getting my favorite cd 's transferred . 
transfers are surprisingly quick through usb 2.0 . 
it is great sounding , even with the supplied earbuds . 
i must have differing preferences than others here , as i prefer the supplied earbuds to the sony 's that i thought sounded good on other players . 
i love the storage in this thing . 
despite the things that i have listed so far , i could live with this item since it saves me from lugging a cd case to work , to the gym , in the car , etc. . 
this is my second creative labs mp3 player , and it is definitely a fine product . 
first of all the player 's sound quality is superior to the ipod . 
the player 's software is very easy to use and very good . 
compared to musicmatch , the software has a better filing system and easier to use . 
to keep it short , this is cheaper , and in my opinion a better choice than an ipod . 
this thing seriously is a good player though . 
overall i like the unit . 
1 ) price / gb of storage 
2 ) storage capacity 
3 ) user replaceable battery 
overall i like it . 
the storage capacity is great . 
the price compared to the ipod is great . 
price , along with the replaceable battery ( which i understand apple charges a small fortune to replace - as well as the hassle of returning it ) were the two main factors on why i picked the nomad . 
i 've had no problems with the software . 
i found it intuitive to use ( i did n't read any documentation for it and was using it successfully within a few minutes ) . 
this is a nice feature ( i.e. it 's early in the morning and you rather listen to " easy listening " rather than " heavy metal " - no problem . 
the software comes with plenty of defaults genres . 
the sound from the player is ok . 
this thing is great , i like to use it to pick up tough stains on my countertop and also to listen to my old 8-track records . 
one good thing , it is 40 gb of disk space ( well , it is 38 gb in reality ) . 
for the price and features it is really good . 
the 30gb zen xtra rocks my socks , spills my beer , but does n't wash my car . 
longer battery life , greater accessibility to online music services , and pc compatibility are the sensibilities . 
i just purchased this player and i have to say that i love it . 
the sound is excellent , the battery life is excellent , the fact that the battery is replacable is excellent , and finally the price , $ 200 cheaper than the 40gb ipod , is excellent . 
the nomad is not ugly , it is not that big , it comfortably fits in my pocket , or heavy , and the controls are not hard to get used to . 
so far i have no complaints and i recommend this to anyone who wants quality over appearance , also anyone who wants a harddrive based mp3 player and wants to pay next to nothing . 
i just bought this player today and i already love it . 
otherwise , this player is awesome ! 
it has a clear blue light that allows you to see everything on the screen easily . 
the volume range is great , so you can blast it if you want . 
overall , this player is awesome and i definately recommend it . 
i received this item for christmas and it has met and exceeded all my standards . 
naturally i did quite a bit of review before purchasing ( i recomend www.nomadness.net ) , and price-wise zens are unbeatable . 
compared to other leading hdd mp3 players , the value per gb is the tops . 
- sound quality : excellent , everything you would expect from this company . 
- the unit is easy to use and intuitive . 
- uploading music is quick and easy . 
although the supplied software can be annoying at times , on whole it is excellent . 
- the unit itself its well structured , with just the buttons you need and none you do n't . 
as often mentioned , the scroll tab is average , however , not difficult to use or horrible . 
the screen is large , defined , and easy to read , and the silver unit is naturally cool . 
there are lots of interesting features included such as eax , and customization . 
- the replacable battery is great since once it eventually wears out ( as all lithium batteries do ) , you will be able to buy another easily . 
also , the nomad 's 14 hours of battery life versus 8 is handy . 
- equipment included is average , but that is n't a big deal since thats not what you are buying it for . 
the headphone earbuds are average , so just use your regular pair instead . 
this player is an ideal purchase . 
i have no problem using the player itself and i feel it is a very good player . 
i have the software working fine now and the mp3 player is fantastic . 
so once i worked out the problem with the software this mp3 player is worth the money it cost . 
i 'm very pleased with my zx so here 's a quick review . 
it is small overall , bigger than the ipod , but keep in mind that this is because different , less expensive but not necessarily inferior technology is used in the zx . 
the zx boasts superior sound quality than the ipod , however it compromises a bit of the unit 's size in doing so . 
the lcd is larger than the previous model , the nx , and has a bright blue backlight which illuminates the screen more successfully than the nx 's green backlight did . 
the scroll wheel is easy to use and works great for me , however many have complained that the wheel is cumbersome and difficult to operate . 
the sound is excellent as one would suspect from a creative product . 
the included eax support is useful at times , especially when you listen to a variety of genres , as it will adjust the equalizer for you which can be a big hassle . 
the signal to noise ratio ( the ratio of detectable , useful data to unusable garbage in , say , a radio wave ; a larger stn ratio is better ) is nice and high at 98 decibles , and it should be noted that apple refuses to release the stn ratio of any of the ipods . 
the software has n't been a hassle for me at all . 
lastly , the price is fantastic : 
i uploaded the drivers and new software in 15 minutes - no crashes or problems . 
usb 2.0 - very fast 
but the sound is very good ( and loud ) and works well on my portable speakers . 
and for those that are intrested the recharger works anywhere in the world ( and is quite small ). 
it looks very cool , and seems quite small to me and very light . 
the scroll button seems ok , i have no problems with it . 
i am very pleased so far . 
very simple to use . 
all in all suprisingly easy to use . 
lots of flaws , but exceptional sound quality , hd size , and price make it a good buy . 
excellent sound - i found the music reproduced faithfully through the jukebox . 
transfer through windows explorer - windows recognizes the jukebox as an additional hard disk , so it allows you to simply drag and drop files from windows explorer to a folder for the nomad . 
i found it very useful for transferring large files to another computer . 
huge storage space - even at 320kbs , you can store a ton of songs on this thing . 
having usb 2.0 makes for very fast transfers . 
i use it for ripping cds , which it does a pretty good job of . 
overall , i feel that it 's a decent buy , and am happy that i own it . 
for the price and size and features , you can 't beat the price . 
the buttons and interface are very easy to use . 
simple click buttons , back buttons volume and display are very easy to read , access and use . 
with this mp3 player you get much more memory for much less than an ipod . 
i have found that the interface on the nomad is very easy to use if you have a basic knowledge of a computer . 
i have had no problem what-so-ever with this product . 
the software installed flawlessly and without any problems on my windows 2k machine . 
the battery life seems good , takes very lttle time to charge , it uploads mp3s quickly and there is no delay between songs . 
took me a few tries to get use to the navigation , but it 's a very user friendly player imo . 
i have n't messed with the firmware at all , the player worked perfect for me right out of the box . 
all-in-all , this is another excellent creative product . 
it 's small , light and nice looking and the display is decent as well . 
i would recommend this product to anyone . 
before asking for the zen xtra specifically for christmas i researched many different mp3 players but finally decided on this one , and now that i have it i could n't be happier and i 'm convinced it 's the best one out there . 
many people have written about the software being its one downfall , personally i have n't had a single problem with the software , i 'm running windows me . 
the cd ripping to mp3 is so easy , and you can even rip the cd directly to the mp3 player , so it wo n't take up space on your pc hard drive . 
the software runs smooth , it 's nice to look at , it 's very organized , easy to follow and makes things very simple . 
the controls on the player are very simple , no need for a manual . 
the player is fast and sounds great , it also has many options like slowing or speeding up the music , or making it sound like you 're hearing the music in a huge auditorium . 
the battery lasts very long when playing music , but writing files to the player drains the battery fast , so you need to have it plugged into an outlet when sending files . 
playlists can be made on the fly , without aid of a computer , and you can use play modes like shuffle and repeat for your ' now playing ' selections or playlists . 
the software could n't be better and the mp3 player works like a dream , i could n't give this anything but a 5 , i wish there was a 6 . 
it is an extremely cool gizmo . 
well i have to say that this product is very good i mean it might be a little big but it still fits in your pocket . 
well surely this is a product that i recommend someone in getting rather than any other mp3 player ( at that size and the price ) . 
not only is it more affordable , but its a better player for windows , which is what i have . 
it hasnt gone below the second notch ( i charge mine whenever i 'm at home and not using it ) , so the battery life seems fine ( so far ). 
oh ... and file transfers are fast & easy . 
it 's easy . 
the buttons are easy to use , and its easy to navigate . 
the big backlight makes things easy to see , and the writing is big enough for people to see . 
my favorite thing about the nomad is the eax feature . 
its really cool . 
sound quality is amazing. i was expecting worse , but its really good ( especially if your files have good sound quality ) . 
you can also slow a song down & speed it up , which is cool too . 
also , you can store data on it , which is a plus. for all you people who want to buy an ipod just to say you have an ipod , do n't bother , this is a much better buy . 
first i 'll start off by saying that this players hardware is pretty good .. . 
while the ease of use was very impressive , i was put off by the price -- about $ 130 more than what i paid amazon for this player . 
i have had the nomad jukebox for about three weeks now , and i am very happy with it . 
the storage capacity is great for me -- 
the bottom line for me is that i am very happy with this product . 
a lot of people complain about the creative software , but i actually find creative mediasource organizer to have some strengths over itunes . 
first , the zen lets you sync to more than one computer . 
the zen is an outstanding way to shuttle music between sources , you can 't do this on the ipod ( except for a cumbersome work-around using the ipod as a hard drive instead of a player ) . 
second , the " automatic " sync on creative lets you review the songs before it begins its transfer . 
the zen serves as a back-up device as well as a player . 
third , creative software allows you to keep two windows open to look at both the content on the player and the computer . 
for those of us that like to tinker , i think creative offers some advantages . 
zen allows you to scroll up and down the song list selected on the player . 
it also lets you remove songs from the play order . 
if you bring up an album , but absolutely hate some of the tracks , the zen will allow you to delete that from the playing order . 
its ability to serve as a back-up for my music collection is a huge plus. 
i got this thing for christmas and i have been very happy with it ever since . 
the software is quick & easy to use & i found the entire process very easily mastered . 
the unit works great with my cassette adapter for my car & is also easily worked without taking your eyes off the road ! 
overall it is a great unit & hopefully creative labs or some other vendor will soon come out with some accessories for it . 
this did n't bother me too much because it 's still a decent size . 
it comes with a good case that fits it snuggly . 
extremely convenient . 
great price . 
i thought the software was decent enough - it was n't complicated to learn at all . 
i 'm really happy with this purchase . 
now heres the stuff you should know starting with the good things : the screen is really big and the blue light in the back is perfect , fast as hell in music transfer , controls are easy to use after mastering the scroll button , great sound and ive heard many mp3 players , a ton of different equilizer type deals on here . 
but it comes with a tank of a case and if you cut a piece out where the screen is you can always keep it in the case and still access everything . 
ive seen em all , the archos , dell , ipods , everything ... good price and great sound makes this one the best in my opinion . 
* price and capacity 
* slick-looking design and improved interface 
* removable battery 
despite its being slightly larger than the ipod , i must say i was surprised to see how small it was when i unwrapped the box ! 
i am ripping my cd collection into 160 kbps wma files ; this gives an average of around 60-65 mb per cd , good for about 900 cds in the ~ 57,000 mb of free memory available to me . 
file transfers are fast , nearly a song per second via usb 2.0 . 
to my ears , a 160 kbps wma file sounds just as good as the source cd , and the zen xtra sounds just as good as a portable cd player . 
the eax features are pretty cool , as well , as creative has included a number of eq adjustments that , for example , compensate for the extraneous noise encountered in a car or on a train . 
at the end of the day , what i wanted was a large-capacity player which allows me to easily play any album from my collection wherever i go , and the zen xtra 's combination of price , capacity and features easily meets those criteria . 
i got this for christmas , and it is a great gift . 
i have been ripping songs into it for the past few weeks , and the ease of use is wonderful . 
the memory will hold an amazing amount of songs , my entire collection of cd 's will all fit on this great little tiny piece of digital fun . 
plusses are the easy to remove battery and the terrific sound produced by the nomad . 
ripping the songs , even with my 1.1 usb connection is still very quick , and the quality is very good . 
considering the price and specs , this might be the best buy out there for a large memory mp3 player . 
it 's really a shame , because otherwise , creative mp3 players are very good , and have the best sound quality of any players on the market . 
after some consideration i chose the 40gb nomad zen xtra from creative , and i have not been disappointed . 
first , the battery is replacable by the user , because creative intended it to be - unlike apple with the ipod . 
it was easy enough to remove the front plate , and there was only one way the battery could be inserted . 
the new organizer software that ships with the nomad zen xtra could n't be easier to use . 
you can create playlists , drag & drop songs and playlists to your player , and rip directly from cd to your player . 
and with usb 2.0 , transferring music to your player is incredibly easy . 
the sound is great , and the volume is more than satisfactory for commutes and shutting out external noise . 
i thought i 'd have to buy a set of headphones to use with it , but the included earbuds work quite well . 
they could be more comfortable , but no complaints in the sound department . 
i 've played around with the equalizer settings and am satisfied at the range of choices i have there too . 
1 . i achieved my basic objective ; my entire cd collection is on a portable device with lots of room to store more . 
the zen has minimal stoppage between tracks ; when listening to music that continues from one track to the next the gap is just a hesitation - a slightly audible click ; if i am not listening for the progress from one track to the next i do n't even notice the click . 
m3u files are used by most mp3 players like musicmatch and winamp , but not creative - without notmad you need to manually recreate your playlists ) ; it does n't care what software you use to rip or catalog your music - creative or any other company - all my 12.5 gb of music were transferred to the zen with correct tags - hooray ! 
given that i already have the zen the only reason i am happy with it is because of the notmad software . 
now that i own it , however , i can 't imagine being without it ! 
i have stored around 60 cd 's ( at 160kbps ) on this and have barely touched the available memory . 
the sound quality is fantastic ( cd quality ) and it is really great to carry this around instead of stacks of cd 's or tapes ! 
it is exceedingly simple to navigate around in this device . 
i did n't read a thing about how to operate it -- it was just intuitive . 
one other plus is that napster now supports this device via their software . 
+ the memory ( 40 gb ) is staggering . 
+ i had no problem using musicmatch software already on my computer to load songs and albums onto this unit 
+ screen was good , easy to read 
+ / - sound quality was good but it was going to take some tweakings with settings to try to make it great . 
i decided to save the $ $ and opted for the zen xtra ... and i was not disappointed . 
the player is intuitive and outputs great sound quality . 
navigation is easy and i found that syncing files from the player to the computer ( and vice versa ) was easy too . 
many have complained about the software included but in my opinion it 's easy to use and effective . 
i love this player and am extremely happy with my decision . 
the price / performance looked just right . 
i did buy the notmad software a week ago and found that a vast improvement . 
1 ) great sound ( > 98db signal-to-noise ratio beats ipod 's " unspecified " ratio ) and good power output allow the zen xtra to drive large head-phones as well as external speakers . 
with my sennheiser 497 headphones , the volume is loud enough at 12 ( max is 20 ) . 
the player works well with my sony srs-a 202 powered speakers . 
2 ) the player user interface ( ui ) is intuitive to use , and allows easy navigation of a large or small collection . 
3 ) the nomad explorer ( winxp style interface ) works well to transfer files back and forth to use the nomad as an external although the tech support web-site states that the primary intended purpose of the player is as a player . 
the nomad explorer provide most of the functionality offered by 3rd party programs like notmad . 
4 ) usb 2.0 means fast data transfers ( 1 song / sec ! ). 
5 ) the cheap , user-replaceable battery ( $ 50 from creative ) is a great advantage over the ipod 's battery which costs $ 100 to replace . 
6 ) excellent battery life - 14 hours beats ipod 's . 
7 ) chic look and good build - the player comes in a compact form with a metal face plate . 
i use it primarily in the provided protective case although i have dropped it about 3 feet from my desk ( by accident ) as well as have played it outdoors in - 30 fahrenheit weather ( by design ) and it has continued to work fine . 
8 ) creative mediasource , although not as sleek looking as windows mediaplayer , is effective in organizing your collection and is linked to a good cddb service ( gracenotes ). 
i do n't always care for gracenotes ' genre listings but it allows easy editing of id3 tags . 
b. fast mediasource cd ripping - takes about 40 seconds for a cd on my pentium 4 pc ( 2.4 ghz with 1gb ram ) with 52x drive . 
c. i do love audio sync which allows a one-click synchronization between the player and the music collection on the computer . 
9 ) wake-up feature that allows you to set up the player to wake up and play selected music at a specified time . 
10 ) multiple play modes - tracks in order of album , shuffle , etc. , is standard on all jukebox players but worth noting that the zen xtra is not deficient in this matter . 
11 ) minimal pause between songs - less than that on other devices - good achievement for a hard-drive based player 
12 ) big storage - my entire cd collection in one small device ( 5717 songs , 491 albums and counting ) ! 
7 ) some people have problems with the flip switch on the bottom that releases the player cover - has not been an issue for me and is immaterial if you use the case as the case covers the switch . 
great sound ; good interface ; replaceable , powerful battery ; good software ; wake-up , sleep timers ; multiple play modes 
can 't beat carrying 500-cd collection with me wherever i go . 
also love waking up to music with attached speakers . 
i felt better with this one since it had the shuffle feature and i 'm not too keen on www.ipodsdirtysecret.com. 
replacement battery is $ 50 compared to ipod 's $ 150 . 
i loved this product when i first got it - great sound , easy to use ( even though i agree that the software was n't the best ) and held enough songs to suit any mood . 
the combination of the price , storage size , and player features makes this player the best on the market . 
fact is , it could n't be easier to use . 
sound quality on this is amazing , as with all creative products . 
even leaving it on the default setting ( without the eax enhancements ) produces crystal clear playback . 
the menu allows you to search for files by artist , genre , and album quite easily . 
the battery stays charged for a long time , and takes no more than 2 or 3 hours at most to fully recharge via the included ac adapter . 
connect the player to your computer ( via usb ) , open up mediasource , and you can listen to your stored mp3s as they stream directly from the xtra ! 
usb 2.0 transfer is insanely fast . 
my first impression was positive . 
overall , a good buy for the price . 
easy enough to navigate through , although i 'd prefer a sturdier button besides the thumbwheel scroll / pushbutton . 
pros : huge storage capacity for the price , easy to navigate , can modify existing playlists on the fly , has a removable battery 
reviews for sound quality are generally ( but not universally ) positive . 
sure , this thing is definitely more cost-effective than an ipod . 
our special friends at creative gave this thing good sound quality , great features , long battery life , and an unbeatable price . 
i bought the player this week and i like it by far . 
removable and cheap battery - a li battery usually works properly for 1-3 years . 
value : comparing data storage with price . 
the appearance is okayed ( at least not ugly ) . 
the size is small ( just a little bit bigger than an i-pod . ) 
easy to use : a lot of reviews has mentioned about this 
the display is awesome , you can see everything you want and read it clearly 
huge storage space , i loaded my entire collection of music , which isnt that much , 400 songs , and still have 26 gb , out of the 28 provided to you . 
the sound is awesome , but if u put it too loud , depends on yoursound quality , the sound might crack . 
with eax on , you can modify your sound , with 4 different presets , which is pretty good , you can get different variations with it . 
if you use software correctly , put in all the id3 tags , you will get an awesome database collection , from which you can easily access your songs . 
i dont know what other people are saying , but the software is awesome . 
battery recharge , is an awesome thing , because it recharges in only like 2-3 hours . 
when you turn on your player , the player turns on really fast , and the music continues to play , as you left it when you were turning it off . 
you can manage your profile , change the contrast of backlight , make different type of display , either list or tabbed . 
you can do other different things with it such as choose what kind of " now playing " interface , you can see the interface as modern or classical . 
there is an alarm , i still havent used it yet , but it should be good . 
there is a clock , and date , which can get helpful . 
the player has firmware , which will remove the glitches , if there are any . 
the music plays awesome , never skips , even if u run for a bit , so you can listen to music without interruption . 
and also , it 's priced very affordably . 
with 40gb of storage i have about 7,500 songs on the player ( everything music file i have is on there ) with room for about 2,500 more . 
the software interface supplied was very easy to use but i went ahead and got red chair 's " notmad " software because of some advanced features i wanted . 
sound settings can be adjusted for personal preference . 
accessing files by artist and album ( i mostly look things up by artist ) is easy and intuitive . 
possibly the biggest advantage this player has ( if price was n't enough ) is the fact that the user can replace the battery him / herself by opening the lid and popping in the new battery . 
since batteries do run out on everything , this will also be a big money-saver since ipods , irivers , rca , dell , all have built-in batteries that need to be replaced by a technician ( apple charges 100 bones for the battery replacement ) . 
try before you buy if at all possible : although i am a mac addict now for over a decade and everyone i know has previously bought an ipod , the nomad zen xtra was a far better value and is just as easy to use with regards to both hardware and software interface . 
i like the nomad 's color better , but it 's not terribly flashy . 
i have had mine for a month now and have to say i have enjoyed it . 
price ! 
sound quality is wonderful , i really like the smart volume sound normalization . 
i quickly got to use to the interface and can find any song / playlist etc fast enough . 
i also liked the fact that you can save custom playlist you made on the player not just the computer ! 
have had the player since xmass and love it ! 
great sound , very long battery life ( i routinely play it for 12 + hours ) , very fast recharges rate , removable battery , storage size , nice screen , firmware updates , and great price . 
this is an excellent player , especially for the price , with features that are comparable to and even excel the ipod . 
for a price that 's still less than even the lowest level ipod i was able to get this 40gb monster , and the best part is it works as great as it was advertised to and then some . 
the system is terrific in size and design , imo looking better than the ipods . 
it 's very solidly built , and has a nice dense feel to it . 
i find all of the controls well-placed and not flimsy in the least . 
the scroll wheel is better than the ipod 's as well , in that you do n't risk giving yourself a cramp running your thumb around in circles endlessly - just a small nudge of the finger and you 're there . 
the screen 's large and easily read . 
sound : exceptional , though i can 't really compare it to the ipod . 
interface - practically seamless . 
yet after ensuring that all the id3 tags are in order ( with the software which is actually not as bad as people make it out ) it actually turns out to be really handy . 
playlists can be generated on the fly ( which is a bit clunky but still a really nice bonus ) or by using the software , and there are a bevy of eq options . 
as i mentioned before , the creative mediasource software is actually really robust despite what others have said , though notmad may still work better . 
it 's easy to transfer , preview , and organize files . 
the in-program id3 tag editing is a strong point , as well . 
it was no problem for me to use their software . 
overall , i 'm giving this 5 stars as i 've seen nothing of the problems people have repeatedly cried havoc over , but as i 've only had the player for a while i leave room for doubt if the headphone jack , hissing , or scroll wheel problems show up with me too . 
please consider this much superior piece of equipment before plopping down half a grand for an ipod . 
honestly , i love this player . 
because other people that complain about this player are talking bull , this player is awesome , it just breaks fast , which is horrible . 
the sound quality is very good . 
having access to so much music where ever you go is terrific . 
Works great, no odor, and uses regular bags.
So far (3 weeks), we've had no problems with the Diaper Champ at all.
It contains the smell from our baby's diapers and we can use just about any kind of bag inside.
I don't know if we'll run into trouble down the road with odors, but so far I have no complaints and I'm very happy not to have to buy those refills.
The Diaper Champ is the best we found!
There are no specail bags to deal with or buy!
We use the cheap $1.99 13 gallon vanilla scented bags from the grocery store but you can use any bag you have laying around.
We empty ours every day and we have never had an odors from it!
It is far better than just a trash can or the Diaper Genie and it's fairly inexpensive as baby products go!
I love that you don't have to purchase expensive refills.
If I had to do it over again, even with the cost savings of using any type of bag, I would go w/ the Diaper Genie.
It's far better than all others on the market.
it's easier and much more convenient to use because it doesn't have CLUMSY and CONFUSING (not to mention expensive) refills.
There is no odor and extremely easy to use.
1. It uses regular garbage bags instead of brand refills.
3. It never smelled - at all.
The container is hard to open, which is exactly what you want when your baby becomes a toddler, and you do have to flip the handle carefully (which has saved more than a few of her toys,too.) I don't consider these difficulties but features for the older baby.
This is a MUST HAVE product for all new moms!
This is easy to work and easy to dispose of the dirty diapers.
It is much easier to fill and unload than the Diaper Genie, plus, why buy refills when you can use trash bags from the Dollar Store?
It also holds a lot more diapers.
look at the size of it!
I highly recommend this!
I have to say that I am very happy with it so far.
I am happy with the fact that I can use any bag in there and dont' have to pay out the nose for replacements.
It's also so easy to use and holds a great deal of diapers.
The bags attach inside the Champ easily and all one has to do is cram the diaper down and flip the handle.
I bought this diaper pail when my son was just a few days old and I absolutely LOVE it!
The diaper champ couldn't be easier to use.
And the biggest plus is that you don't have to buy any expensive refills.
And it does an excellent job of keeping the odor contained, which the diaper genie never did!
If you are looking for a user-friendly diaper pail that actually does keep the odor contained, than the diaper champ is the one for you!
THIS ITEM IS EXCEPTIONAL I like the ease of use and it held the odor in great.
Diaper Champ is by far the best diaper pail!
It holds a lot of diapers, not to mention the odor!
It's easy to use (just a flip of the lid, and the diaper is gone!).
It's also easy to empty out.
And best of all, no wasting money on special refill bags---this takes ordinary garbage bags!
Whether you are using disposable or cloth diapers, this is the truly the only diaper pail to get!
Even though I never ventured into the cloth land, I was very impressed by how well this works at keeping diapers and their accompanying odor in the pail and out of our life!
Being a very economical person, I appreciate the fact that any plastic bag can be used with this system- I never did like the prospect of buying special Diaper Genie refills.
But from my experience, by the time it gets to that point, the bag is really heavy, so I think this is kind of helpful- it's a built-in way of keeping the bag manageable upon emptying.
This is a really great buy, for yourself or as a shower gift.
Go for the Champ.
I love this product!
With the enormous numbers of diapers that you go through with a newborn, it was great how easy it was to dispose of the dirty ones.
Plus, the fact that it used regular trash bags is great.
No need to pay for the special refills that the other brands require!
and we still LOVE it!
*holds a LOT of diapers--a full week of toddler diapers!
(we wrap them nice and tight) *we use our regular kitchen trash bags--cheap!
*holds the odor in nicely!
(every now and then I spray down the inside of the pail with Lysol) *easy one-hand use *impossible for my inquisitive child to get the dirty diapers OUT of the pail Every now and then odors do escape the pail, but that is rare--and it usually just means that we've crammed too much in there and need to change the bag.
We keep the Diaper Champ in our daughter's nursery and her room definitely does NOT smell like dirty diapers.
It holds quite a few diapers, and pops them in quickly and easily.
I use the same store-brand tall kitchen trash bags I already use in the kitchen for it -- no special "diaper" trash bags necessary.
It works with a minimum of fuss.
The diaper champ turns the smelly diaper into "what diaper smell" in less time than that.
This is one of the best purchases we made.
Great product, easy to use, economical, effective, absolutly fabulous.
Update I knew that I loved the champ, and useing the diaper genie at a friend's house REALLY reinforced that!
There is no comparison, the chanp is easy and smell free, the genie was difficult to use one handed (which is absolutly vital if you have a little one on a changing pad) and there was a deffinite odor eminating from the genie plus we found that the quick tie garbage bags where the ties are integrated into the bag work really well because there isn't any added bulk around the sealing edge of the champ.
I love this pail!
No smell, easy to use with one hand free, and best of all it uses regular tall kitchen garbage bags so you don't get suckered in to using only the bags made for the pail that are imposible to find!
I think it's great.
It definitely keeps the smell out.
First 4 months it was in our bedroom and we did not even smell any odor.
The diaper champ is the best!
I have tried other pails, but none have compared positively to the Champ.
1) The champ is easy to use.
With the Champ all you had to do was drop the dirty diaper into the opening and flip the lid.
It was so easy my toddler would dispose of her on diapers.
2) The Champ uses regular store bags.
You do not have to waste money or time trying to purchase special bags for the Champ.
3)The Champ is Odor Free for at least 15 months.
The Champ did not start letting a little odor through until well over a year.
Regardless to this fact, I believe the Champ is the best way to go.
Let the Champ win you over!
No need for deodorizers.
I use the regular kitchen trash bags and it is so easy to empty.
even did while daughter sleep and no noise!
I use the scented bags and even if I don't no smell!
This holds alot and does not take up alot of space.
But like I stated, its better then a trash can, but I'm not sure if its better then the Diaper Genie.
It holds almost a week's worth of diapers, and you don't need expensive refills - any kitchen bags work.
At first I had a problem with some smell, then I realized if you flip the lid back and always keep the same side facing in - then there is no smell at all!
Personally, I am VERY pleased with the Diaper Champ.
It is mindless to operate.
It doesn't stink, ever (like some have assumed since it doesn't wrap each diaper into its own neat little cocoon).
And it is very easy to clean.
I can keep one hand on my baby and dump the diaper at the same time, it is that simple.
This is a great diaper pail.
There is no odor and it is very easy to use.
(You can do it one handed while still hanging on to the baby.) Also, we like using regular trash bags instead of having to worry about buying refills (like with the Diaper Genie).
And it's the largest diaper pail I've seen without taking up more floor space.
and we definitely prefer our Champ!
Not only is it much more cost effective (you can use regular trash bags rather than Refills at $5 a pop), it is easier to use and clean, and has a larger capacity.
I got the diaper champ because of the great reviews as well as the fact that you can use regular garbage bags.
It works great.
I can't smell anything (and believe me, this is quite something with my baby).
I ended up buying one for upstairs and one for downstairs because it works so well and because I change him so often downstairs.
We have been using our Diaper Champ for almost 14 months now and we are very happy with it.
It sits in the corner of our bathroom and we have never had any problems with odors at all (and we live in the damp and humid South, where odors of all kinds are generally rife).
It is easy to install and change the ordinary trash bags, easy to clean, and most important, easy to use one handed - just insert folded dirty diaper and flip the handle.
We have never had any problems with anything like loose wipes getting stuck (we always wrap them in the dirty diaper).
It is a bit difficult to get the unit open (the advice to take it slowly is sound), but now that our son is walking and exploring, I consider this a positive attribute!
Update (March 2005): My son has been out of diapers for almost 2 years now, but the Diaper Champ hung in there till the very end - easy to use, no problems with odors, and one of the best bargains among all of the paraphernalia required for the modern baby :-)
I decided to go with the Diaper Champ rather than the more popular Diaper Genie, because I didn't like the idea of having to buy special bags.
THIS PRODUCT IS A LIFESAVER!!
I HAVE NEVER HAD AN ODOR PROBLEM!
No one has ever come to my house and noticed 'diaper odor.'
In fact, people who have been present while I changed my almost 3 month old son's diaper have been amazed at how the very 'potent' smell of the dirty diaper seems to disappear once I dispose of the diaper in the Diaper Champ.
SIMPLE AND IT WORKS!
All in all, this product is definitely one I would recommend and certainly worth the very reasonable price.
I love the diaper champ, it is really easy to use and since you can use regular garbage bags it doesn't cost an arm and a leg for refills.
Using your own bags is much cheaper and convenient.
The height is a more convenient reach than others, where you have to hunch over.
Its stable, so a curious toddler can't easily tip it over.
I wanted this product because i didn't have to buy special bags for it and it also came highly recommended.
This is a GREAT product!
The Champ works great.
We use regular kitchen sized garbage bags.
We've never experienced odor from the pail.
It was easy to assemble, and the diapers fit perfectly into the little nook before they make their way into the pail portion.
I also love that you can flip the device with one hand...
Excellent diaper disposal unit.
I am soooo pleased with this product!!!
A wise investment for the pocketbook & for the nose!!!
Diaper Champ is great.
So I can't tell you if Diaper Champ will be as good at containing the formula generated poop smell, but it's excellent at containing the smell of poop of my breastfed baby!
Friends told me that the Diaper Genie did not work very well, so bought the Diaper Champ based on on-line reviews and I have been happy with it.
It works easily with one hand, which is important.
Also, it takes any kitchen sized trash bag, so there is no special bag to stock.
While the perfect ordor free diaper pail has yet to be invented, the Diaper Champ is a good as it gets.
I was using the cheapie pail...and it worked ok until the opening device fell apart.
I could probably use a trash can and be ok at this point, but this prduct seems to work very well so far.
This one is really great.
I actually took a friends word on it and went with this Champ when registering and I am glad I did.
Well the Champ has survived it's first year with our son and it is great!!
The thought of not having to buy refills and just using regular bags is awesome!
We just buy the smaller bags that come like 250 to a roll and are sented and they are like $6.00 and they work great.
We just recently had to buy another roll of bags. SO $6.00 for a year of bags- can't beat that!!
We lysol the champ every time we change the bag out and have not had any problems.
This is really a nice diaper pail.
I recommend it to both parents of infants and toddlers.
In fact, I liked it so much after using it with my son who is now 2 years old, that I bought one for our new baby's room.
Wow - was that disappointing and we didn't even have it 6 months before it broke.
I bought the Diaper Champ and have been very happy for the following reasons.
1.  The Diaper Champ doesn't require special refills that are expensive and hard to find!
We just use the Glad tall kitchen trash can bags with odor shield from Target and they work wonderfully.
We don't have to worry about running out of refills with this diaper pail!
2.  It can be operated with one hand - Leaving a hand on your baby on the changing table.
So much safer than the others that require a two handed operation!
The Diaper Champ is so simple that my toddler loves to put his own diapers in the diaper champ and flip over the handle.
3.  Bags are easy to change.
Works great!!!!
5.  The price is right.
I purchased this router at a woodworking show after watching the CMT people using it to demo their bits and was impressed how it performed.
From the Internet, woodworking books, local stores and personal opinions the Hitachi M12V 3-1/4 HP router time and time again came up to be the router of choice or best for its price.
But I wanted to do some raised panel work and needed more power and variable speed to run the large-diameter bits.
The Hitachi has plenty of power, runs smooth, and cuts effortlessly through maple (with Freud bits!)
Since I use it in a table, I don't use the plunge feature, but if I ever need it I've got it.
The Hitachi is made in Malasyia, and looked cheap compared with the Makita, which is made in the USA.
But it is smooth, it is powerful, it is affordable & it has a proven track record.
So for the money it costs for one of those top-of-the-line models I've got a good router & a nice table to put it in & I like that.
Hitachi's M12V is a big beast of a router.
In my table the M12V has been a real champ.
The heavy motor and continuously variable speed control let this router churn through everything I threw at it.
Nice things about the M12V: - in a table, the powerful 3 1/4 HP motor is great - soft start helps a lot to control the beast when you turn the router on - continuously variable speed control - Amazon's price
This is truly a Clydesdale among the industry 3HP+ router workhorses.
Built like a tank, yet nimble enough to be comfortably used with the Leigh dovetail jig.
The soft start is a tremendous help for this type of operation.
The edge guide is top quality, easy to install and accurate.
This was possible due to the variable speed settings for any sized bit.
The height adjustment knob is a bit flimsy, but it works well and provides good accuracy.
This is a great deal, and I'm elated with my decision to go with Hitachi's green machine.
Wish I could give it 4 1/2 stars.
I noticed that the micro adjustment knob and collet are well made and work well too.
The speed control is well designed and it works perfectly.
The included fence guide is easy to set up and quite accurate as well.
The plunge lock and power switch are very easily accessible which is a must when doing free hand routing.
It is heavy enough to make it stable, but not too heavy to preclude hand use.
Overall this tool is very well worth the price and I have no regrets about my purchase.
This is an excellent router for the money.
Other than that, i think it is the best router for the money.
I must have gotten a good one.
I don't have problems with the depth adjustment, the speed control, the collet ( I haven't tried the 1/4" sleeve yet) .
I would put the Hitachi up with the best!
No vibration!
Smooth plunging! ( it did stick a bit so I sprayed it w/ lubricant.
It is a great router for a table and with the depth adjustment knob it is easy to adjust depth prescisely.
It is very easy to change bits without removing the router from the table and the shaft lock works great.
Very good balance in the hands and lighter than most 3 1/4 hp models.
The soft start is nice.
The price is incredible with the bonus pack and Hitachi's $25 incentive ( you need the code ---go to Toolseeker.com and it tells you)
The total price with delivery (free shipping ) was $135 !
Less than a cheap cordless drill or a laminate trimmer.
Saw the Hitachi on Amazon.com with their $25.00 coupon (at the time) and could not resist trying it out.
UNLIKE other reviewers, I like the tool because it is easy to operate outside of the router table.
Both the on/off switch (soft start) and the depth lock are within easy reach of the right hand.
It is no more heavy than any other powerful router and not as bad as some Porter Cable models I tried.
For me, it is as important that the tool be comfortable to use as it is that it produce a high-quality result.
Can recommend the Hitachi in this ergonomic arena -- at the price quoted on Amazon it is a bargain.
After getting used to the M12 all the rest seemed lacking.
On top of being a workhorse and ultra reliable, it is just a plunge router that works really well.
I use it in the table (never take the springs out - just attach the fine adjustment knob), in my woodrat and freehand and it works great in all circumstances.
What an upgrade!!!
I have only used it with the 1/4" collet and a 1/2" round over bit, but I love how it starts up with little torque and runs very quietly.
The depth adjustment and bit changing is much easier on the M12V than it was on my old router.
The handles make it very comfortable to use and I experience little vibration.
Combine this with the excellent price we got in the Gold Box, and I'm really happy.
I'm sure I don't use it to the degree of some of the other purchasers, but I really like it!
I first used the router in the free hand mode and liked it a lot.
I find it very stable and comfortable to use, it doesn't jump around or make me feel like I need to use a lot of arm strength to keep it under control, and  it has very good visibility to see your cut.
It came with a good fence that  is simple yet precise and thats well made and won't break.
Also I like the  position of all the controls and the fact that it doesn't have any extra  knobs or gizmos.
I prefer things that are simple.
The router has plenty  of power for any type of bit or wood I need to cut, and the speed control  knob is easy to get to.
Its  not a perfect system but its a very good one.
I've owned this router for over 8 years and am somewhat satisfied with it.
It is quiet and has plenty of power.
I find that it is stable in my hands and its' weight actually contributes to that stability.
I love the performance and features of this router.
For the money, I'm not sure you can do better.
It's very quiet for a universal motor-driven tool, and the height adjustment stick and variable speed control are great.
Smooth plunging mechanism.
The guide fence for freehand routing is well made and solid.
Even with that, I highly recommend this router - outstanding performer.
I purchased two of these beauties.
I have a tendency to do quite a bit of research before I drop money on a tool and everyone I talked to loved this router.
One cabinet shop has been using one regularly in a router table for 11 years without a problem.
The design of the collets is excellent and far exceeds any of the craftman (toy/junk) routers I have previously purchased.
They were easy to setup with plenty of power to hog through anything I have encountered.
I have less money invested in the router table and dual routers than I would have if I had purchased a single cheap reliant shaper.
The setup works awesome, as with any tool I look closely at the individual tool for it's merits, and not just the company as a whole.
I would however highly recommend the m12v router !
I'm not overly fond of GREEN but when I used this Hitachi M12V it turns out that now I'm very fond of it.
The smooth operation variable speed and a set of good Jasada Bits will provide just the right combination for great predictable results.
Its well made and user friendly.
You'll love it!
It is currently permanently mounted (3 years now) in my router table and will most likely stay there until its shot.
This router has soft start and runs smooth and true.
I use the router with a 3 1/2in raised panel bit with no problems.
It has enough power to hog out all the material in one pass, but I usually take multiple to prevent blowout and a smoother finish.
For the price, I am considering purchasing a spare just to have as a backup.
You just can't go wrong with this one!
Enjoy.
This is an excellent router for the price.
The first one lasted about 6 years of heavy use.
This is a well-made and powerful tool.
The M12V has been great.
The height adjustment works well- not perfect.
The wood can be pushed thru fast or slow with little bog.
What I really like about- its quite, it can handle my workload and it was so cheap that I can throw it away and buy another one without blinking.
I did like the heft of the machine.
The power is incredible, it cut through MDF and plywood like butter.
The edge guide has a nice micro adjust feature that works well.
I do not count this as a negative, however, because it is not that much of a nuisance and at the price for what you get this router is way too good to pass up!!!
The ones I've kept (Porter Cables, Dewalts, Bosch, and this Hitachi) have proven their worth over the years, however, when I need a real workhorse, I grab this router.
I recently had to run a 3/4" straight bit through hard maple to make a deep dado and was amazed that this machine didn't even slow down.
I could take 1/2" passes and it still didn't skip a beat.
I've yet to find the limitation for this Hitachi (my only Hitachi tool, by the way) and quite frankly, I don't know that I have the muscle to push this machine any harder.
Bottom line is that at $160, this is an absolute steal.
I've got a buddy who's trying to offload his almost new $300 Speedmatic because he saw what this router can do.
It is without even a slight doubt, my new favorite.
The Hitachi M12V is a dream to work with, smooth starts, adjustable speeds, micro-adjustable depth, and plenty of power to spare.
I couldn't believe what I had been missing.
If you're looking for a 3hp plunge router, the Hitachi M12V is your best bet to stretch your equipment budget.
I'll be getting a second one for my router table!
I have been impressed with the power of the Hitachi M12V.
It doesn't bog down under load.
Cuts are easy and smooth.
I use it on a router table, and it is works well.
Other than this, I am very pleased with the router and would buy it again.
I really liked the price...
I like the speed control.
It has plenty of power.
All in all I am pleased with the router.
The power, low noise operation, and speed control makes up for the problems I have experienced.
Overall it is a great value.
For the price I don't think you can beat it.
This is a fantastic tool to use.
This is a quality product, not to be confused with teh cheap junk that Hitachi gets manufactured in China.
When the router is working it is a very nice machine for the money.
But, for the money it is a good machine.
For the hobbiest, it's probably a nice buy.
For the person that uses the equipment every day, pay the extra and get a reliable & safer unit.
SOUND QUALITY: The iPod's sound quality is pretty good.
The bass is deep and the treble is clear.
  EASE OF USE/DESIGN: The iPod is a very easy to use MP3 player, and if you can't figure this out, you shouldn't even own one.
The Ipod is a fine cousin to the early macs and current offerings from Jobs and Company. 
Long live Apple, long live Macs, and long live the Ipod!     
I have an ipod and it is a great buy. 
 Very sturdy and strong.
The software with the iPod includes iTunes, which allows you to play the music on your computer, rip CDs onto your computer, and move your music from the computer to the iPod. 
This new click wheel iPod allows you to navigate through the menus and song via a touch-wheel for scrolling and click-able buttons for selection.  
 The song quality of the iPod is excellent, and the included ear buds are actually more than satisfactory, for most users.
 Battery life keeps improving on the iPod, and a new iPod will give you up to twelve hours of play time, per charge. 
Thank you Apple!  You make fabulous products. 
 The product I rate five stars, 
  Plus, if you order from Amazon.com, they will exchange it for you no problem.  
 This one has a color display, which I like a lot, being very visual. 
I loaded a lot of photos into it and they display very clearly for such a small screen and, very importantly, the transition from one photo to the next is instantaneous. 
 The sound is just fine. 
It comes with an adapter to plug into the wall, which I hear is a step up from the other iPods, which require you plug it into a computer to charge it.  
 Pros: Large Hard Drive for the $$-- 20GB and 40GB are both affordable. 
Decently Sized Screen-- One of the larger ones on the market at 2" 
Decent Battery-- On the average size, but the 40GB comes with a dock.  
 FireWire & USB2.0-- For those fortunate enough to have FireWire400, your in for a real treat with autosync.
 Great Design-- Very sleek and touch wheel has still never been successfully copied (vertal ones are the only competition); and now the wheel clicks, taking away a lot of headaches from 3rd gen and very navigable in the menus. 
Good sound-- Plays very nicely, even though the stock headphones are kind of weak Durable-- not the most durable because its mostly plastic, but very compact and sturdy 
Games-- not really important, but existant 
Hold Button-- suprisingly not all MP3s have this; this allows you  to have all the buttons unusable, so that you don't accidently hit something in your pocket. 
. iTunes-- this is a love-hate relationship program; usually people with Mac like this program than people with a PC, but depending on your computer expertise, this could be a difficult program to use, and it is required for an iPod. 
  Comments: Overall this is still a great value, but is kind of overrated in the sense that there are beater deals on the market.
Versatile and stylish.	 
I had a Casio unit, which had given great service, and would have been happy to get another one, but was tempted by the iPod's sleek design, storage capacity, connection options- - firewire and USB, and its integration with iTunes.   
The controls and the menus are clearly displayed and easily fathomed  
 The iPod is a very nice product, which given reasonable care, should give a lot of service.      
 I have about 6 gb used on my iPod so far (well over 1000 songs), and as far as I can tell, all of them play at near-cd quality.
Other than the fact that one can't delete a file directly from the iPod, the interface is excellent and mind-numbingly simple to use.  
 As for iTunes, I don't find it to be as good as the Windows Media Player as a computer mp3 player, but it is good enough. 
 In conclusion, I gave the iPod a 4/5 because anything this expensive should would work just about flawlessly.
Everything I Wanted! The Apple iPod has become one of the most sought-after electronic gadgets - and for good reason.
 Its sleek design, large memory capacity, compatibility with iTunes, and ease of use makes this one of the best portable digital listening devices on the market. 
 Unless you have an enormous music/audio book library, the 20 GB model should have more than adequate storage capacity, with a stated ability to hold 5000 songs.  
 Features: click wheel to navigate; ability to work with Windows or Mac; optional backlighting (you can have it on all the time, or have it shut off to save battery power after 5, 10, or 20 seconds); ability to download PDA info; automatic or manual download from iTunes when iPod is plugged into your computer. 
There's even an equalizer (under "settings") that allows you to adjust the sound for acoustic, bass booster, bass reducer, classical, dance, "deep", and electronic.
  With accessories, you can make the iPod into a digital recorder, broadcast it remotely through stereo speakers using wireless technology, and play it through your car speakers using either a CD adaptor or FM stereo broadcaster. 
ITunes can be downloaded from the enclosed CD or for free from the Apple site.    
All in all, this is a wonderful device.  
  Apple has definately fulfilled its reputation in making quality equipment, and surprisingly wasn't as expensive as its reputation normally holds.  
 Battery non-issue. 
Finally, compare the iPod to other players on a cost/Gb, and also consider ease of use. 
The iPod is not overpriced compared to the market.
This is the best purchase I've made in a very long time.
The sound is INCREDIBLE; very clean, very wide dynamic range of bass, mids and highs, and can be very loud if I turn it up full blast.
The Great And Versatile iPod	 I love my iPod! 
 The sound quality is excellent, accessing the music is easy, and the controls are generally well thought out. 
 I still give the iPod five stars, though, as it could have been something I did incorrectly during the install (though I did follow the onscreen prompts) so I'll give Apple the benefit of the doubt.
The battery holds a charge for a very long time (maybe 15 or so hours of use) so realistically there are no real range or endurance issues associated with iPod use. 
(It sure does look nice, though!)  I recommend this to any music lover anywhere: the quality of the audio is excellent, the controls and indicators rapidly become intuitive, and the storage capacity and battery life are huge!     
  Using the software iTunes is relatively simple, you just plug the USB cable in, wait your machine to detect the iPod and voila, any songs listed in your iTunes library will be transfered on over to the iPod.
 And, with the iPods' full volume up, all you have to do is adjust your receivers' volume and your set, since the iPod itself acts as a strong amplifer of its' own.
  However after purchasing a 20 GB iPod it's clear to see the superiority. 
For a sleeker, smaller and more "average" MP3 player the Nitrus is great but the iPod blows it out of the water - the interface is great and the design is wonderful.
The actual experience of USING the iPod is magnificent.
 The design, as mentioned above, is sleek, cool and trendy (and I think trendy = good, but it's always hard to tell these days). 
 The battery life lastes 12 hours, and charges quickly. (As mentioned above, the initial charge is a minimum of only two hours - not too long at all!) Once you've downloaded your music, you can access the tracks by artist, genre, album, composer (this comes in handy when the actual composer is different from the artist - e.g. covers of songs), etc.
 The!  sound quality is great. 
The included earphones are pretty good - my advice? 
  The ease of use of the iPod is a major attribute.
 With the iPod, you can also store documents and contact files (from programs such as Microsoft Outlook) when it's connected to your PC as an external hard drive. 
Also included in the "games" section is the great music trivia option - which tests your skill at being able to quickly place your own songs. 
  20 GB OR 40 GB?  The pros of the 40 GB: Comes with a "dock station" and double storage space (10,000 songs).
  Overall the iPod really is an almost flawless beast. The capacity in the 20 GB is more than I think most people would ever need and, for the price, I highly recommend it.
Everything else about the ipod is great, the click wheel is very easy to use and so is the software that comes with it.
Finding all the albums, songs etc is much easier than you would think it would be even if you have 20 gig (well 18 gig) worth of music.
  It all sounds great too. 
 You can even use the ipod to store files from your pc and export your outlook files to it.
	 If, like me you simply want an iPod to play your mp3's, buy this one. 
So reliability is the winner here for the iPod.
For looks, well iPod is head and shoulders better, both the iRiver and Creative Zen look positively ugly when next to a gleaming iPod. 
 The iPod package comes with everything you need, the AC adaptor, firewire cable (quicker than USB, but slower than USB 2 which it also gives), those snazzy and powerfull headphones, and of course the player. 
 These issues aside, the iPod is kind of like the cell phone in that once you have one, you can't be without one.
Also, you have to use it with iTunes - or they'll sue, dammit!  But iTunes is about as good as anything. 
 The player is great. 
 Overall, this product is AWESOME. 
 All the "cool" features of the mini, but with 20GB instead of 5.  
 Really easy to use.
 Has the click wheel and the ability to scan through thousnds of songs and organizes them great.
 Has a great helpline.
 They fix the problem and help you with whatever your I-Pod needs Comes with two USB ports and a charger.
 They are EXTREMELY convient and you don't have to buy them seperately Has I-Tunes, which provides qulity music at low prices.
The I-Pod is the best thing I have ever used. 
I found that to be the most impressive thing about the iPod 'mini' - basically for ease of use, and the feel it gives. 
 This unit comes with the USB/firewire cable as a standard item now. 
  I have transferred in about 2,400 tracks so far - very easy to use both the Ipod and iTunes. 
I was worried about what the sound quality would be like, but that seems to be just as good as the actual CD sound.
I love the features on the iPod and the many things you can do with it. 
The arm band is fantastic and it doesn't budge even at the gym.  
I love the slim design; the weight would only be an issue if it were bulky.  
The ear buds that come with it look cheap, but the sound quality is amazing. 
  The click wheel is incredibly convenient, however it can be a little overly touchy at times, which will make you frustrated with your own fingers.  
 I am a big fan of iTunes, simply because it is terribly fast and convenient - IF you are buying the songs from the iTunes site.  
 Way to go Apple!  
I rarely get drawn in by mass-commercialism, but something about the iPod made me say, in the words of Lou and Andy, "I WANT THAT ONE!" I was willing to shell out 
This router does everything that it is supposed to do, so i dont really know how to talk that bad about it. 
It was a very quick setup and installation, in fact the disc that it comes with pretty much makes sure you cant mess it up. 
By no means do you have to be a tech junkie to be able to install it, just be able to put a CD in the computer and it tells you what to do. 
It works great, i am usually at the full 54 mbps, although every now and then that drops to around 36 mbps only because i am 2 floors below where the router is. 
It really is a great buy if you are lookin at having just one modem but many computers around the house. 
There are 3 computers in my house all getting wireless connection from this router, and everybody is happy with it. 
Its the easiest thing to setup i thought, and i am only 16...So with all that said, BUY THE ROUTER!!!!     
I recently bought the Linksys WRT54G router and have been very happy with the router itself. 
But the product iself is great.  
Once you set it up, it's great. 
And it is EXTREMELY well-priced for what you're getting. 
Another 5 star performance. 
This setup using the CD was about as easy as learning how to open a refrigerator door for the first time. 
Pertaining to the speed issue: I got 54Mps while I was in the same room. 
This router works at 54Mbps that's megabyte not kilobyte. 
I hooked the Linksys wireless router up to a broadband connection which is running at a maximum of 700 plus Kilobytes on the download e!
Broadband hooked up to this wireless setup flies. 
Installation was as near automatic as can be. 
All in all this is a 5 star piece of equipment. 
Even during the firmware updates my roommates did not loose wireless connectivity.  
New firmware update allows for automatic wireless network configuration. 
All you have to do is click one button on the router configuration window and the router automatically senses the devices and configures the network. 
Awesome for the newbie, though I personally like to fasten every bolt myself.  
Comes with a installation CD which instructs you step by step to setting up the router. 
You need to know absolutely nothing about setting up the network.  
The router works fine for both wired and wireless.  
I can go pretty far away from my router and still connect wirelessly.  
Overall, if you know what basic steps to take, it was not difficult to connect, and the s/w worked well to connect.  
I'd give it 4.5 stars if possible, but since 5 stars would be misleading, I give it 4 stars.     
I have had mine for about a year and use a third party firmware on mine and love it. 
just want a wireless router for home or your very small business, you can just get a WRT54G from here and configure it. 
I would highly recommend that you do this if you want to learn something, but if you are not interested in learning this stuff and just want a working wireless router, just get the WRT54G.     
Yes, the 1-800 number probably redirected me to someone in India, but the guy was easy to understand, and he helped solve the problem. 
It'll make life a lot easier, and preclude you from having to give this product a negative review.  
This is my fourth Linksys product and, aside from the rough start, I'm very satisfied with this router.     
This linksys router does it for the RIGHT PRICE. 
The range is terrific, I am using this for my home and I was transferring at 50+mbs from my backyard.
I've since gotten the Linksys Modem (BEFCMU10) and stacked it with the WRT54G router and it works fantastic!!! 
It took me about an hour to set up a wireless environment in her townhouse and she hasn't called me yet with any problems. 
there are instructions to encrypt your personal wirless network so no one else can end up hogging/stealing your bandwidth. 
And the tech writers have made the installation process SO EASY for people lik my aunt to follow. 
A very well made product that has worked very well for me over the years. 
I upgraded from an older 801.11b router to the Linksys WRT54G for its improved security, and of course, speed. 
As I mentioned in my first paragraph, it supports WPA security, which is far superior to WEP.  
In addition it is very easy to setup.  
anted to rate the router higher than 1 star, due to its security, easy of use, etc.  
So far it all works fine with either cable or wireless connections.  
I was fed up and turned to WRT54G because of its positive reviews, good past experience with wired routers and frequent firmware updates to correct any bugs.   router[+2] The setup was very easy. 
Just follow the instructions carefully, it's all based on a CD that has everything you need to get you up and running in no time. 
The dual anteanna is a plus and the design is slick.   
drops and strong signals even from the backyard. 
The WRT54G offers excellent security features and much more (and easier) configuration menu that I didn't even need a manual to setup correctly.  
Even though you could get a cheap router these days, I'm happy I spent a little extra for the Linksys. 
The quality is significant and you'll be very happy from saving time and the headache.      
I got it working fast enough.  
It is a nice router in all ways but one.  
I also wanted to switch to Broadcom hardware (which the linksys uses) because my WiFi MiniPCI card in my dell laptop with lucent silicon in it used 70% of my 1.2Ghz laptop's CPU when using the wireless at full speed.  
However, setting up using the quick start instructions was a breeze.  
It's easy to install the security on this product but Linksys doesn't do a good job of explaining why its important.  
While I am not happy that a solid state device died after such a short period of time, my quick review of this product space did not yield any other brands that seem much better than Linksys.  
The new router came with an updated setup utility that makes getting the router installed a fairly straight forward process. 
Unlike other reviewers, I have found the support to be responsive, almost no wait time on the phone, and relatively knowledgeable. 
Overall, this router seems like a reasonably priced product th!
at works as well as can be expected for products in this space and the company backs it up with good support.     
It's easy and really works, with some incredible range.  
Compatability with other devices is excellent too; I've only found one 11b device that won't work with its mixed mode (and it won't work with *anyone's* mixed mode).
Setup in XP was instant and intuitive. 
The main advantage of this system over its predecessor is the ability to open a wider pipeline between clients. 
Linksys quality and tech support have been outstanding.     
My experience with installation was quite good.  
I upgraded both my card and router and really had no problems with installation on my Sony VAIO laptop (XP operating system).  
The card basically installed itself and the "install wizard" on the CD that came with the router basically set the router up to work with one computer (with the 54g card) and also a second computer in my house (with an 11b card).  
I haven't tried to set up any advanced features on the router, but it is not difficult to set up for basic use.  
The documentation is much better than the documentation that came with the 11b router -- I needed a lot of help from Linksys technical assistance to set that one up.  
I like this router a whole lot better the Linksys 11b router it replaced -- the signal strength seems ot be much stroners, seldom falling below the "very good" range (and most often excellent within 25-50 feet of the router.  
The transmission speed is also quite good, with pages loading very quickly.  
I have had no problem either with backward compatiaibility, in that the "mixed mode" feature lets you both 54 and 11 Mb cards off the router.     
As far as dealing with network access of other computers this router is pretty good given the price- remember this router is the same one that was released right when the G standard was introduced to the market. 
All in all, it's a good router if you don't have the cash for a Speedbooster one. 
I just replaced my old Linksys router with this one, turned everything on in the right order, and it was up and running with no problems.  
All of the wireless components that I bought were a breeze to set up as well.     
This product is by far the best Broadband Router on the market, I bought this to replace one of those Linksys Instant Wireless B routers, worked great for about a year. 
My opion is concentrate on what you need now, This product has EXELENT range, holds a teady connection, hasent even droped one and i have it for more than a month now. 
IF YOU NEED A WIRELESS ROUTER.... GET IT GET IT GET IT.... works really good....     
I was an early purchaser of the WRT54G, and had a few problems with stability and speed - finally, the March 03 firmware update has resulted in an excellent product!
I just upgraded to the Linksys WRT54G Wireless-G router last month and I am very happy with the quality of the product.  
This router acts as a wireless access point, 100 MB switch and a router making it a nice multipurpose device.  
The inital setup of the router was simple. 
Works pretty well. 
The best part about this router is now I have a DHCP server. 
My brother had an old Linksys B band wireless router in his home and it was like magic. 
Well Linksys was one of the original big players in the router industry.  
ying to point out they have experience, and so the reliability of the connection you get is among the best.  
This model appears to be especially good.  
The darn thing works as promised and it's amazingly cheap too. 
If you want to work wirelessly, this router does just what you want it to do and my geek friends say that the security is as good as it gets right now.             
The setup was a breeze, I had some reservations about a wireless network (see my review for linksys wet11)but this item was on sale as well as the WET11 so I just had to splruge. 
To set up the xbox, wap, and ethernest bridge, with the encryption on was less then 30 mins. 
The setup software did everything. 
In a week of use i've never had to reboot the router. 
A decent peice of hardware with great speed (I get the same speeds as with my comp connected directly to the modem)  and good signal quality. 
I guess the two antennae help with that besides making it look cooler. 
I am getting better speeds on all my web programs. 
There seem to be fewer collisons and dropped packets as I read from the router logs than with my old Dlink router. 
It works well with my VOIP adapter, which is also a Linksys. 
Pros.1.Speed  2. Signal Strength  3.Advanced Configuration Options
Purchased this router a few months back, NO PROBLEMS whatsoever.  
In fact, it supports the new WPA encryption standard, which is WAY better than WEP.  
Works perfectly with my netgear wireless PCMCIA. 
Feature wise, its a lot better than the dlink and netgear routers out there.     
Reset the network, tried the connection, and it's working like a charm. 
However since this Router is backward compatible, that doesn't pose a problem at all.  
Overall, it'll make my move that much easier knowing I don't have to worry about connectivity.     
For more than a year, and it is totally reliable.  
No down time, great signal strength.  
There is an open-source firmware on the net which has tons of extra features.  
Setup is totally breeze and Linksys's web site is pretty easy to navigate.  
The fact that has an open-source firmware makes it a great option in my opinion. 
So the pretty solid router all around good for the money  here's the link to firmware updates http://www.sveasoft.com/forum6.html      
Absolutely no problems with this router. 
I downloaded and updated the firmware, and followed the easy setup instructions. 
A call to customer support (got to a live person within a couple of minutes) helped me tweak a couple of the settings to streamline performance.  
Speed is not a problem.      
After upgrading the drivers and firmware a few times and e-mailing tech support for some setting tips it now works fine. 
As far as Linksys goes, I have used several of their products and they seem to hold up well - no problems.     
Getting the router setup in a "vanilla" configuration that works for 99% of users was very easy, and I was able to do this no problem.
Second, the setup CD actually worked perfectly. 
I still need to read up on some of the security settings, etc to fully understand all that's up there, but bottom-line is that the installation was like night and day compared to the Speedboost router. 
When I saw a high gain (low price) antenna was available to the WRT54G router, I thought I'd happily give up some (practically unattainable anyway, since you've got to be in spitting distance from the router) speed in favour of wider coverage. 
Having done all this, I was quite pleased to see that all corners I needed were decently covered by the signal. 
The box is upstairs, and in the farthest room I get connected at 11-18M speed - that is similar to the older 10M ethernet standard. 
Apart from speed, the signal is consistent and works without interruptions, etc. 
the WRT54G plus the HGA7T is a perfect solution if you need wireless coverage in a wider area or for a hard-walled house as was my case.     
All of this said [as it's on it's way back to Amazon], the one song it did include provided far better sound than the IPOD. 
The base was deeper and the highs were crisper. 
what a kick butt Mp3 machine and the freedom to get songs from a reasonable source, instead of paying for them two or three times, then get the Creative Zen IPOD killer, kiss my ass Itunes!
The sound is great, the portability, etc... all the "stuff" you expect from a good MP-3 player, this Zen Micro has it. 
) One outstanding positive feature is the battery. It holds a charge for a long time, longer than most other similar products and the user can replace it easily or take another along as a backup. 
Creative did well on its rechargeable battery feature. .
The Zen Micro FM receiver is ok, not great. 
) The Zen Micro appears sturdy and well constructed, hefty, if you will, far better than many of its competitors. . 
Well, I have an Ipod mini - and I really like it, but all in all, I like the Zen Micro more.
Smaller size, 1 gb of more space, radio, voice recording, removable battery, cooler look, all in one.  
I love how small the thing is, and the blue glow - I've had it for two weeks with no electronic problems at all.  
Creative Media Source is very easy to use once you get the hang of it, and the file transfers are fast.  
Sound quality is great, fm tuner is fine, as is the recorder.  
This is the mp3 player with everything I need.  As long as it lasts me a good three years, I'm satisfied.        
Also If you want a device that does soo much more than the Ipod mini but is at the same price, this is the player for you. 
Upon opening the box I was confronted with this small cute little MP3 player. 
The software included is an easy installation and you have the option of using the Creative software, Windows Media Player 10, or simply Windows Explorer to move music back and forth between your Zen Touch. 
The package also comes with a USB cable, an AC adapter, a pair of headphones (they're okay until you get a better pair), a stand, and a microfiber pouch to carry your Zen Touch in.  
Overall I'm incredibly impressed with my new Zen Touch. 
It's cute as anything and the glowing blue LED looks super cool around the edges. 
For the price I think this is a remarkably fun MP3 player.
I've had this player for more than 4 months and I'm very happy with it. 
1 Speakers at home, I rarely use it with the earbuds, though they are much better than the ones you normally get with other mp3 players.  
The Look & Feel: I have the black one and the contrasting neon blue on the buttons add a very nice ambience. 
It feels tiny in the hand without it. 
The stand that comes with it is very useful to prop it up on the desk. 
The blue backlit LCD looks really neat and is easy to read. 
The touch buttons are textured so that your finger sdon't slip which was very thoughtful.   
Reliability & Build  I dropped the player once from about 4 ft, and it fell hard, but kept on playing. 
The hardcase they give with it must work well.  
It feels solid and not flimsy like the carbon.  
Sound  I'm no audiophile but I was amazed by the clarity the player had, it was much better than the sound card on my Computer and louder too. 
I have had the ipod mini and it performs on the level with my sound card but the micro beats it outright.  
Best of all the WMAs(I have a lot of them) sound great.  
Utility Its got a huge list of features including an FM Recorder a Calender and contacts list. 
The songs recorded with FM are as good as the original signal. 
Creating and modifying playlists is easy and clean.  
I think that for its price compared to the ipod the creative zen is pretty good.  
The good news is that the creative support is very responsive and after some emails and postal exchanges, i had a new zen.  
the sound is quite good, in terms of volume.  
i didnt have any installation problems; and the touch pad is fine, even if it is sort of inaccurate.  
i didnt get ipod because i dont especially like itunes (no music i want, but thats just me) and the creative product was cheaper; and i needed to be able to use WMA files.  
all-in-all, its good enough for its price as long as it doesnt break again due to normal use.       
The battery is removable. 
 FM radio built in (Howard Stern).  
Record memos using the built in microphone.  
The player looks SO much better when you're actually holding it. 
The back of the player is nice too, with water ripples inside the clear white coating.  
You can use it as a storage Hard Drive.    
I have no problem using iTunes with the Zen Micro (in a makeshift sorta way).   
However, if there was one thing I liked about the creative, it would be the car adapter. 
While they all seem to have their own positives and negatives, I picked the Zen Micro over the Ipod mini, because I am not an Apple person, never has been - I wanted something that is fully compatible with Windows Media Player. 
Also, the WMA compression format is superior to MP3, especially at lower bit rates, so I needed a player that could handle WMA and integrate well with my Windows XP computers.  
I was fortunate to get the packaging that still included all the accessories (desk stand/hard case, belt clip, wall charger, etc). 
And so far, I have been very, very happy with my Zen Micro. 
It's being used daily and I have had none of the problems reported by other reviewers (headphone jack, player locking up, etc). 
The Micro has an impressive array of very nice features and a well designed user interface. 
What I like the most:  - Small and solid feel. 
The Zen Micro is smaller than it looks in pictures, and feels very solid. 
The blue backlight is pretty cool. 
The screen is clear and readable, and the touch pad works very well, it took me less than a day to get the hang of it, and now I like it better than having to click buttons or fiddle with a separate volume control.  
- Great sound! I was very impressed, I encode at 192 kbps and the audio quality is great, especially with the better headphones. 
The first thing I did was upgrade the firmware to the version required for WMP10, it syncs flawlessly with Media Player and transfers are fast.  
- Replaceable battery. 
With the right firmware, drag and drop to and from the player like any other jump drive.  
I have not yet used all the features, like the calendar, etc, but as a music player this little thing rocks.  
If you can get one with all the accessories and a cheap extended warranty, this is the player to get! Highly recommended.     
The Micro seeemed like an iPod for less. 
Pros: - Excellent sound, even with the headphones that come out of the box, but it absolutely rocked with my Bose Quietcomfort 2 set. 
- Looks sleek, compact, has a radio.  
Don't worry this player rocks.  
It was also the most appealing.   
For the Zen Creative focused on packaging which looked well thought out, well presented and easy to open and put back together.  
It has a cardboard slip cover with a nice layered box casing inside.  
A distinct IPod relation is evident with white colored cables, power plug and the very nice Zen case with a white rubber inside covering.  
I do give create to Creative for their attractive design.    
Creative has put a lot of effort into making this player appeal to those true geeks that search for coolness and functionality in electronic devices. 
Creative was defiantly giving the IPod a run for their money with this device.  
It makes the Nomad I purchase feel and look like junk.  
Everything shines of quality.  
I was more excited about this player upon opening than I was about the Nomad.  
I am now staring at an array of stuff including Zen Micro player, stereo earbud headphones, a rechargeable lithium-ion battery, an AC/DC power adapter, a USB 2.0 cable, a belt-clip, a stand, a stylish cloth pouch, an installation CD, a quick-start guide, and Creative MediaSource software.  
The interface works great.  
I enjoy getting use to the touch pad. 
In minutes I was easily navigating through the menus.  
What impressed me most was the sound.  
At 128 the songs sound very good.  
The Zen lives up to the audio quality I love and expect.  
The Earbuds are great headphones as good as my AGK Studio 240, well not as good but darn close.  
The Zen was an impressive purchase and I would highly recommend it to anyone using Napster.  
I absolutely love it. 
It's so small. 
It looks sleek and modern. 
It holds plenty of songs. 
The sound is amazing. 
The menu is easy to use and understand. 
I love the touchpade controls. 
They're easy to use. 
The radio and voice recording are nice. 
The earbud headphones are really nice. 
The battery has a long life. 
It's rechargable and supposedly easy to replace though I haven't had to do it yet of course. 
The file ripping/transfering software that comes with the player is easy to use. 
It's faster than WMP. 
So far I have no complaints with this player. 
If anyone is thinkning of getting an ipod mini, forget it and go with this player. 
It's cheaper, holds more songs and is smaller.      
I have stored 40 audio CDs and i still have close to 2.8 GB free.   
User Interface: The software is simple and straight forward. 
You can use the player to store your computer data files (Good feature to have).   
Battery : A Big Big plus. 
Most of the other players I checked dont have user servicable battery. 
Each battery lasts about 10-11 hours. 
Another good feature is that you can charge the battery by just connecting the player to your computer using the USB cable.  
FM tuner & Microphone : Having a tuner in the player is a blessing. 
Builtin microphone is great for recording short voice notes. 
Sound: This is where I love Zen the most. 
Excellent sound I mean the player has juice. 
The bass treble the sound detail is awsome. 
I compared it to other CD players (Two models of Panasonic, Rio & samsung) and they were no way even near Zen Micro.  
Looks and shape: I have a black one and the first time I charged it and switched it on jeez the blue light looked so cool. 
Its compact and has rounded edges. 
Fits well in hand in trouser pockets.   
Freebies you get: A cradle with detachable stand and belt clip, some thing very handy and useful. 
FM transmitter (belkin has a good one) to use Zen with your car Sterio FM Tunner   Latest Find: Connected this baby to my $3800 audiophile audio system and it produced clean sound compared to Ipod. 
Thankfully, Creative has come through with a product that puts the Ipod back in its place.  
While I have not had the "privilege", as many call it, of owning an Ipod, based on the experience of friends who have had some misfortune with their Ipod (and subsequently purchased the Zen Touch or Zen Micro), I can pretty much rest assured that my decision to purchase the Zen Micro was one of the more informed ones.
By focusing exclusively on quality rather than excessive marketing, they have introduced a player that can look the Ipod straight in the eye and not flinch.  
While I'm not too keen on their customer service (none of the products I have from Creative have given me issues), I can definitely recommend the Zen Micro for the simple fact that it does exactly what it is supposed to do and more...without needing any of the extra hype except word of mouth.  
About the product:  The Zen Micro is a sleek, stylish device that caters not just to "hip" youngsters but to people of all walks of life who like to listen on the go without having to worry frequently about battery life, size, or the "awkward" factor.  
It fits comfortably in my shirt pocket and while very well-designed, doesn't look to ostentatious while I'm walking around with it.  
The interface, while a bit confusing at first, is very easy to navigate after about 15 minutes.  
Battery life is exceptional, lasting longer than the 8-10 hours that seem reasonable with most music players on the market.  
Transferring files couldn't be easier thanks to the included software bundle.  
Also, I am quite partial to the Creative MediaSource Organizer and Player software, which I had with Audigy ZS sound card originally; it is definitely an added plus.  
All-in-all, Creative has definitely come up with a winner in terms of product design and features, and I look forward to the Nomad/Zen line of products seizing more market share as people begin to realize that quality is a better determinant of experience than quantity and hype.  
Initially, I was very impressed, after loading 180 songs it seemed to function very well but then it would lock up on me and a battery removal remedied this, I then downloaded the upgrades and everything seemed to be alright. 
The extra GB of hardrive space, removeable battery and FM tuner, as well as the fact that I was previously a satisfied owner of the Nomad II put it over the top for me. 
Fortunately for me, I have yet to have a single problem with this player.  
I think the OS and controls are very well thought out and although I'll admit I was a bit intimidated during my first few hours with the Micro, the interface and controls became second nature after the first day or so. 
However, there is a more detailed PDF manual on the CD (and online) that should answer any questions about the operational features of the Zen Micro. 
As opposed to the Nomad II or any other flash based player, the songs load extremely fast...about one or two seconds per song. 
I also like the fact that you can edit your MP3 titles, etc. 
After comparing the included Creative earbuds directly against my Sony MD-E828LP's and Sennheiser MX-400's, I find myself still using the Creative's, which in my opinion, sound every bit as good and have a slightly longer cord.  
Zen Micro[+2][s] Overall, I'm very pleased with the Zen Micro and based on my experience with it (as well as it's older sibling Creative Nomad IIC), can recommend it without reservation. 
Perhaps I bought the Micro to be different, the cheaper price tag (from Amazon), the design, or avoiding the high iPod theft in NYC subways. 
Whichever it may be, I'm happy I've made this purchase.  
When I opened the box, I was shocked by the size of this thing... It's TINY! 
It's shorter, sleeker, more compact and fits comfortably in my small hand than the iPod...My Nokia cell phone towers over this bad boy! 
The interface has a sassier flair and the blue-lit trimming is an added bonus. 
Moving on to sound department... It delivers! 
There are extra features packed inside this unit (some that most will hardly ever use) such as FM radio tuner, voice recorder, calendar, and alarm clock. 
Speaking of battery, it's removable AND replaceable! 
Overall, the Micro is a solid device and I haven't fell into a problem with it yet *knocks on wood*. 
Transferring music is a breeze. I don't subscribe to music services, but as mentioned on other reviews, Micro allows you to subscribe to services OTHER than iTunes. 
It may not top the iPod Mini, but it's definitely an alternative if you also want the extra features and good sound quality.  
Strong Points: - Design: small, comfortable, curved, and stylish. 
Colors: 10 variety of HOT colors made it difficult to choose from. 
You don't need to cough up an extra couple bucks for a "special edition" to get black! - Sound: Awesome! - Batteries: removable/replaceable. 
- Audio Formats: supports both MP3, WMA... And yeah, WAV too.  
You do get 1 more GB than an iPod mini.  
This product is amazing and better than the Ipod you can get at the same price. 
the 4G Ipod costs the same as this 5G Zen Micro. 
It also has a voice recorder and FM radio that you can only get on an Ipod if you but an adapter seperately. 
Creative did an awesome job with the design. 
The headphones have great sound and durability and mine came with some extras when I bought it (a stand, a belt hook, charger) that I know doesn't come with every one. 
I have the black one and adore it. 
It looks nice and sleek and the blue background light looks awesome against the black. 
I bought my Zen Micro three months ago mainly because I preferred the size and style to the iPod mini. 
Overall, I've been very impressed with the player. 
I've had almost no problems with the firmware (ie, lock-ups, shut-downs etc), but I have kept the player up to date. 
I'm not sure whether this is related to the charge cycle of its Li-Ion battery, the better firmware, or a combination of both factors. 
I imagine if I left my player untouched (no backlight) it could play for considerably more than 12 hours at a low volume level.  
One of my favorite features about the player is its ability to sync to Windows Media Player. 
Its just as fast as the included Creative software, but much less invasive, and overall better looking. 
The touchpad is great once you get used to it, and I much prefer it to standard buttons or scroll wheels (as on the Dell DJ for example). 
Also, the touchpad seems to be waterproof to some degree.  
Its ability to record radio is useful as well, but would have been moreso if it could be preset.  
The player looks great, feels great, and sounds great. 
So far it has been very durable (other than the little pads on the earbuds), but those aren't really necessary as I find them comfortable on their own. 
They also sound excellent compared to other earbuds including retail sets like Panasonics and Sennheisers. 
I've dropped the device several times onto hard surfaces, and it still works flawlessly.     
This year, it seems that I choose my timing perfectly, having discovered the awesome device that is the Zen Micro.  
Everything that I have listed above, the Zen has, and more. 
The menus are easy to scroll through; they are laid out naturally, and make sense. 
The computer interface is 90% good, only losing points due to the fact that "Creative" branding is all over the place within it. 
Songs transfer lightning fast, and the two batteries that came in my box give me 24 hours of listen time. 
On the fly play list creation, address book, removable storage drive capabilities, sound recorder, the list goes on people, this thing is literally so chalked full of goodies, it was like Halloween all over again. 
So far I have used all of the above-mentioned features, and find them well designed, and easy to understand.  
That's it for now, what are you doing still reading this, click the "Add to Cart" button already!      
Right out of the box, I loved it, better features than the Ipod, great sound quality and no limitations on what music sources I can use. 
So, I was one who was ready to give it 5 stars with no complaints at all. 
ORIGINAL REVIEW December 2004 I'm sorry to read about other people having problems with their Zen Micro, but mine has worked great! 
This is my first MP3 player and I am so impressed with what such a small device can do.  
I have ripped over 100 songs from my CD collection and it was so easy and fast, and they all sound great.  
I love that you can create custom playlists, and organize music in so many different ways.  
I love my dark blue zen micro and would definitely recommend it.  
The FM tuner, the 5G of storage, and the removable disk are all great features.  
Overall, I am very pleased with it.  
The more I use it and figure out how to do things, the more I like it.     
Before you run out and buy an iPod, understand something: there are REASONS the Zen is worth encountering this kind of hassle, principally excellent (for MP3) sound quality.  
The supplied headphones are hands-down better than the mediocre iPod buds. 
The player is smaller than you think. 
Bottom line: If you value excellent sound quality and the ability to use music subscription services, and are willing to deal with the possibility (not the certainty) of setup gremlins, by all means get the Zen Micro.     
The Zen Micro is near perfect.   
It's still alive, still kicking, and still playing.   
The Zen Micro (mine's black) has a lot going for it.   
It fits into a hand well, it has a removable battery (this is important), great sound quality, fm stereo, recorder, smooth UI, and a feature that most unipods lack... char!
The accesories that come with the player are great. 
White earbuds ( i replaced those with some shure headphones, big difference), a case, a stand, a clip (which doesn't really work), and a nice little zen micro bag. 
best in class. 
It gives you the most bang for your buck, period.   
Creative has been making computer sound equipment for decades and with the zen micro it finally has something with enough quality and, yes, charm to win a nice size of the digital player pie.   
Pick your favorite color and buy it.      
Pros The Design is very nice, and the colors are too. 
It also has tons more features then previous creative products, and most of them are very useful such as the ability to custimize the main menu to show the stuff you want, not the default items (creativelabs.com for more on that).  
The battery is also convenient, but could have been better, such as the Zen Touch's battery (but at least this one is removable).    
If you don't mind all the buttons being touch sensitive, I'd recomment buying it to try out, and also buy an extra 2 year warrenty for it (there are some offered here, for about $15 dollors I think).  
anyway, my wife got this for me for my birthday and I love the thing. 
the program is called Gnomad and works great for me and seems to cover all the features the included windows sofware does. 
+looks snazzy +smaller than a pack of smokes - easily transported +ac charger included as well as a hardshell that comes with a clip and a stand adapter +USB cable !
+Battery life is awesome IF you upgrade the firmware [requires a windows pc] OR make sure to always plug the ac adapter into the player before plugging into the outlet +Awesome sound quality... I mean it is Creative right? 
+Sorts music by artist, album, genre, etc... it's easy to wade through 5 gigs of tunes to find what you're looking for. 
But since it's so small, it isn't a big deal to bring it with me.  
Overall though, i'm very happy with it and highly recommend it to folks looking for a mp3 player, even if it is to pretend your not a braindead consumer giving into the marketing hype of the iPod. ;)     
I finally decided to purchase this player because it was compatible with Napster 2 Go....which is a subscription service, allowing me to download as much music as I want for a $14.95 flat fee.  
And I must say...this MP3 is very cool.  
It's so cute...and behind the black panel it glows in a neon blue.   
After installation, which was VERY simple....I downloaded any updated software from the Creative website, before I downloaded any music.   
The sound is very nice.  
I also like the lock feature, so it makes the touch pad inactive.   
Otherwise, I am extremely please with the Creative Zen Micro 5GB MP3 player.    
However after playing with it for three weeks now, I'm convinced, the Zen Micro is superior. 
I think sound quality should be the first and foremost feature, and the Zen is leaps and bounds better in sound quality, with no need to upgrade the earphones. 
I thought the FM radio would not see much use with so many tracks avaiable to me, but its great for tuning in to TV programs at the gym while on the treadmill, concerts and programs being simulcast, NPR, and on and on. 
Mine is as easy to use as the mini without any firmware download. 
Its also smaller, and gets more looks. 
An extra gig of room, FM radio, voice recorder, PIM applications with sync to Outlook. 
This is really a no brainer. 
[+][s] I purchased this over the Ipod Mini because it had several nice features: extra 1G storage, WMA support, replaceable battery, and especially that it wasn't an Apple product with their proprietary architecture.  
Better for the Zen Micro is Outlook compatibility. 
Creative has excellent music software, a very responsive tech support group (they are quick on firmware updates, and make them publicly available), and usually a good array of accessories.  
The Zen Micro is no exception: in addition to the case, it comes with a neck strap, and has all of the necessary cables for syncing and charging.  
If I could, I'd trade-up on my Creative Muvo2 and snag a Zen Micro tomorrow.  
This is a perfect blend to accomplish both tasks.  
I also own a retail store and this little guy easily plugs into my AUX slot in the store's sound system.  
Feature for feature, I find it a very sweet little player; equipped with a higher end headphone system, between this and th larger Zen Ihardly use my home stereo system anymore. 
On the whole, I'm quite happy with the purchase.  
The sound is bright and clear, the ability to store any MP3's (and not just Apple-approved files) is great, and I plan to make use of the storage space and sound recording from time to time.    
The device looks very cool, I think (exactly as the photos promise), it's comfortable and lightweight in my jacket pocket, and the interface and controls are easy enough to navigate after a bit of practice.  
No offense to Amazon, but I was able to find one online for just over 200 bucks (I'm sure prices here will continue to sink), and that also seemed quite a good bargain for the amount of storage space.    
I like some local stations, Stern, and NPR, and so the radio seemed like a great option.  
Have not had any issues with the headphones or fragility.  
As I said, I don't regret the purchase at all.  
eball metaphor: I was hoping Creative hit a home run here, and I think the Zen Micro is more like a stand-up double.  
Actually, the Creative Zen Micro solves all that.  
Sound quality? Phenomenal. 
unarguably better than Apple's, and nice earbuds to boot.  
Your choice of ten colors in a beatiful package.  
Five gigabytes is plenty for my great albums. 
Tough as nails. 
No skips, and it hasn't faltered once (despite your inevitable drop or two.
Flawless. 
) No locked-in proprietary business like Apple; this baby plays WMAs too.  
The voice recorder is a beautiful add-on; not even necessary, but just an example of why Apple just wants your money and Creative Labs wants to make a better player. 
Gets nice sound too. 
The FM tuner is just a little spare icing on the cake.  
In conclusion, this player is beautiful. 
Power for the tech-savvy, ease of use for the less fortunate. 
But it; you won't regret it.     
This player is absolutely phenomenal, I haven't had any problems, and if you're worried you will have problems, I suggest buying it at a retail store that has a good return policy but anyways... I find the touch pad very easy to use, and I'm surprised so many people have had problems.  
The sound quality is superb, much better than that of an iPod, in my opinion.  
The radio works excellent in my area, I'm not sure everywhere else.  
The software is very easy to use, and the transfer is super fast!  
I'm not gonna go into the features cause if you're reading this review, you've probably already looked at them, but I must say the DJ feature if Very cool and the removable battery is also a bonus!  
The blue light also makes this player one of the most fashionable in the market also.  
t simply the best player on the market for a really low price, so why look anywhere else?      
I've had it for about a week now and have to say it's one of the best purchases I've ever made.  
it's a great looking, easy-to-use device but it's the sound quality which is truly amazing -- far better than my Sony mini-disc player.  
I have no problems with the touch pad (once the sensitivity is set to low) and the interface is a breeze to use without even looking at the PDF manual.  
Why bother when it works perfectly with Media Player 10?  
The extra Gb is just a bonus.  
If your looking for a great sounding mini player, you can't go wrong with the Zen Micro.     
It was a good player when it worked and I loved the design.  
The Creative Zen Micro, at first glance, is a dream come true for all mp3 and music lovers. 
The Zen offered a great alternative. 
It's easy to use, and makes transfering your CD collection to the player a cinch. 
The clarity is unbelievable, which means you can cram almost the full 2,5!
Other mp3 players won't give you the sonic clarity of the Zen at this compression level, so I imagine they won't at lower ones, either. 
Transfering MP3s are a cinch with the included software. 
The Zen plays mp3, wma and wave formats, which makes it more versatile than the Ipod. 
The greatest thing about the software (in my humble) is that it reads your CD info. 
Track #, name, artist, album and genre is automatically-retrieved via internet-labeled, and properly catergorized into the Zen. 
rks almost without fail, no matter what your taste in music is: From relaxation music to hard rock, to hip hop, to Korean and Japanese, to Afro-Cuban and Salsa, Jazz, Blues, Country and Pop, this feature performs well. 
Oh, and another is the cool "halo" light that surrounds the touch pad, and light's up when you touch the screen, and how the light glows when the Zen is connected to the computer. 
One: It's size: It's smaller than the Ipod Mini, and holds more music (5GB to the IPOD mini's 4GBs). 
Two: it has a removeable/rechargeable battery, so you don't have to send the thing in when the re!
This player is fantastic in terms of audio quality, ease of use, and features. 
Otherwise, this is a great "alternative" MP3 player for those of use who don't want to worship the mighty all-powerful Apple. 
I got it to use with the new $5-per-month service from Yahoo (Music Unlimited,) and despite the above issues, I love it. 
I have owned some kind of Creative audio product since 1993 and have never had to call tech support.  
The main issue now is that this new Zen Micro seems to be the best on the market at least temporarily.  
It beats Apple on the storage space, it beats apple on the removable battery (and batter life), and I personally like its interface more than the Ipod scroll wheel.  
Further, the tech specs suggest that it has better audio quality than the Ipod.  
I have had several MP3 players over the past few years, and have to say that this by far is the best that I've owned. 
However, the Ipod does not come close to the number of extra features that the 'Zen Micro' has to offer.   
Some features that the 'Zen Micro' has that sold me on my purchase include: a 5G hard drive...actually an SD flash card drive...very large and much more than actually needed, the ability to sync with Microsoft Outlook's calendar, the long battery life of about 10 to 12 hours (I can change the battery myself for about $40 to buy vs. 
sending the unit to the company of purchase which costs about $90), the ability to record with a built-in microphone (great for recording reminders and meetings), very sturdy construction, and not to mention...the sound quality is excellent!  
As far as user interface is concerned, the best and easiest to use seems to be the one that comes with the player, 'Creative MediaSource Organizer'. 
This program enables the user to batch convert and convert audio files from one format to another. 
These include: MP3, Wave, WMA, WMA Pro, and WMA Lossless; it is very user-friendly simply by right-clicking the file(s) to be converted. 
By far this seems to be the best value out there for the money; if you are undecided, the Creative Zen Micro seems to be the best choice.     
When it's working, it's great but it is very tempermental.   this camera is perfect for an enthusiastic amateur photographer . 
the pictures are razor-sharp , even in macro . 
it is small enough to fit easily in a coat pocket or purse . 
it is light enough to carry around all day without bother . 
operating its many features is easy and often obvious - i 'm no annie lebovitz , but i was able to figure out most of its abilities just messing around with it at a camera store . 
the manual does a fine job filling in any blanks that remain . 
the auto-focus performs well , but i love having the 12 optional scene modes - they are dummy-proof , and correspond to many situations in which i would actually seek to use the camera . 
comes with a 16 mb compact flash and one rechargable battery the charging unit , included , is fast and small . 
i enthusiastically recommend this camera . 
it 's easy to use , and yet very feature rich . 
in the auto mode it functions basically as a point and click , the scene modes are very easy to use and produce good results . 
the manual mode is feature rich and i can 't wait to get the hang of it . 
the macro mode is exceptional , the pictures are very clear and you can take the pictures with the lens unbelievably close the subject . 
the battery life is very good , i got about 90 minutes with the lcd turned on all the time , the first time around , and i have been using it with the lcd off every now and then , and have yet needed to recharge it . 
i fell in love with this camera , it combines ease of use , with an immense amount of options and power . 
this camera is ideal for people who want more power , but do n't want to spend 1000s dollars on a camera . 
with nikon , although picture qualities are as good as any other 4 mp cameras , i 've had the following headaches ; 
but overall this is a good camera with a ' really good ' picture clarity ; an exceptional close-up shooting capability . 
otherwise , it takes very good pictures ; shutter delay is n't so bad either . 
nikon 4300 , i feel , is the best camera out there for the features and price . 
the pictures are absolutely amazing - the camera captures the minutest of details . 
the possibilities with auto , manual , and the very helpful " scene " mode , which offers 11 optimized situational settings like portrait , landscape , beach / snow , sunset etc. , are endless . 
the movie mode is also working great . 
the 4300 comes with excellent easy to install software i use it on xp and win98 without problem , battery charger , usb and video cable . 
i experimented with online print ordering with the two major us brick and mortar retailers , and they both delivered great results . 
even at the " normal " setting , a 8x10 print ! shows not a single sign of visible rendering or pixels - you could never tell that the picture has been taken by a " digital " . 
the battery life is ok , but can be somewhat short when working a lot with the monitor on . 
over all a fantastic very compact camera , which made us experience photography on a totally new level ! 
after nearly 800 pictures i have found that this nikon takes incredible pictures . 
the digital zoom takes as good of pictures , as the optical zoom does ! 
i love all of the features , and presets as well . 
sunset feature takes incredible pics in the morning , and the evening ! 
the software you get with this camera is perfect . 
touchups , redeye , and so on are very easy to alter , and correct . 
battery life is good , although i recommend two rechargebles , or a alkaline backup , for those emergency pics you have to have . 
all and all , i am extremely pleased with this camera . 
great camera , great investment ! 
the nikon coolpix 4300 is wonderful -- easy to use , high quality , and compact in size . 
the auto setting does a great job most of the time but there are manual settings for those who want them . 
it has many great features and very few bad ones . 
it takes excellent pics and is very easy to use , if you read the manual . 
downloads are a snap and quick . 
controls easy yo use and easy to get to . 
i 'm extremely glad i bought this camera . 
really happy with this little camera . 
it is n't big and offensive , though you would n't know it by looking at the pics it takes . 
settings for just about everything , beautiful pics and beautiful prints . 
i expected the 12x digital zoom to be grainy , but onfull size high to fine quality , the zoomed images are quite impressive . 
still , at least from my perspective , a great camera for the money , and i 'm a happy camper ! 
this is a wonderful camera . 
4 mp gives you room for the future gaining experience ; cost offsets over time from wanting more in a camera , 3x optical and the fact that it carries nikon 's quality reputation behind it make the whole package prove itself worthwile at the price . 
one neat thing - i have taken some pictures in what i thought would be impossible lighting conditions pitch black rooms - no problem for the camera - rooms looked like they had ample lighting . 
this little camera has created a marriage between myself and nikon. never knew i could love a digital camera so much . 
the software that comes with it is amazing and the online service that comes free is really very neat. clean clear and well focused on over 95 % of all photos taken by a beginner . 
just point and shoot and the photos were great . 
the memory card fit nicely since i also have a pocket pc and it automatically installed a picture software on my pda wolla . 
if you have to buy a camera on a buget, this has got to be the one . 
great camera , i have been using this for several months and got excellent results , simple friendly usage , in many scenes indoor , outdoor , snow , close up macro etc. 
this is my first digital camera and i can say that i am quite impressed with the features that it has . 
it is easy enough to use for a beginner like me but it has plenty of features for me to grow into . 
i particularly like the way it aids me in taking my macro shots . 
my friends were impressed with the quality of the pictures i took ! 
battery life is ok . 
great camera , and for the price you can 't beat it . 
i found the controls very intuitive and learned how to manuver through the menus quickly . 
the quality is superb . 
the small size is perfect for my little hands , but may perhaps be uncomfortable or awkward for a bigger person . 
the 4300 is a very durable , compact package , and i find nikon to be a brand that i can trust . 
it really is an awesome camera that is hard to beat for general-to moderate snapping . 
they take excellent macro shots as well . 
the menus and features are easy to manipulate and access , and it takes silent movies . 
i compared this to a lot of other cameras , believe me , it 's value for money . 
the picturers are amazing . 
recently bought this coolpix 4300 along with a 256mb ultra flash card . as expected , i happily found that qualities of the picture are excellent with 3m-4m pixel / fine combos and many of the user-friendly functions are very similar to slr models , and with added convenience of a digital camera that you can see pictures immediately . 
i particularly like the " txt " file which records all the control information for all the pictures you take. 
the compact digital camera is especially useful if you have little children around and you can always take the camera with you and take many pictures of them . 
a nikon will make you happier and leave you lots of good memories , as always . 
i highly recommend this camera to anyone looking for a good digital camera that takes great pictures yet does n't take weeks to figure out how to operate . 
we take this camera with us everywhere and are constantly amazed at the quality of the pictures that we get and the number of different ways the camera allows for pictures to be taken . 
i am a picture fanatic so i consider myself picky and if your the same way this camera will not let you down.now buy it ! 
i have it for a week now , and this camera has exceeded my expectations . 
the daylight pictures are brilliant and the indoor shots are very good provided that your subject is no more than about 8 feet away . 
uploading the images to my windows-based pc is very fast and simple . 
in summary , i love this camera and would whole-heartedly recommend this to anyone wanting a high quality point and shoot camera in the medium price range . 
great camera . 
i am impressed with how easy this camera is to use . 
it takes great pictures . 
the manual is easy to understand , and it is mostly idiot proof . 
it is small , unlike my canon slr , so it easily fits in my pocket . 
i got this camera about a month ago and i can 't put it down . 
i selected the 4300 right away and have gotten high quality pictures every time . 
autofocus feels exactly like my film camera while scene and manual mode add a little fun challenge to it all . 
i have not been disappointed with my purchase . 
picture quality in outdoor settings is indistinguishable from 35mm . 
i am extremely satisfied with this camera . 
the " scene " mode works well for the remainder of shots that are not going to be in a " regular " setting . 
however , its 3x optical setting is acceptable for 70 % of the shots that i take . 
if you 're looking for a small , compact , super resolution digital camera , you can end your search with the nikon 4300 ! 
after a lengthy and extensive journey for a feature-loaded , high performance , travel size camera , i initially gravitated to this little gem because of the superior picture quality 4 mega pixel . 
after using it for about a month , i can state unequivocably that this nikon definitely delivers a huge bang for the buck . 
its easy to use and the sheer fun of being able to use an array of nikon accessories like the telephoto and wide-angle lenses is the proverbial icing on the cake . 
yes , the picture quality and features which are too numerous to mention are unmatched for any camera in this price range . 
the design and construction are excellent -- as is the legendary quality of the nikon optics . 
there are so many functions in this little , yet powerful camera ! 
seriously ! i love it ! 
but this camera is great ! 
the picture quality is amazing and you can connect it to your tv and could make silent movies that way if you wanted to . 
it does have a lense cap , but it wo n't let you take pics with it on which is real good . 
the battery recharges ral fast and the recharger thingy that comes with is real nice . 
ooh , and i dropped it and it still works fine : this little camera has so many features i have n't even gotten to all of them yet . 
it 's easy for beginners to use , but has features that more serious photographers will love , so it 's an excellent camera to grow into . 
it 's light weight enough to take with you everywhere , but powerful enough to get outstanding pix . 
i love the continuous shot mode , which allows you to take up to 16 pix in rapid succession -- great for action shots . 
i 'm amazed at the photo quality -- prints are indistinguishable from 35mm prints . 
1 it has all the features an amatuer photo-enthusiast would want . 
2 it is easy enough for my grandmother to use . 
3 it is very compact but the controls are so well designed that they 're still easy to use . 
6 the nikon coolpix line is a well-established line so you know support and parts are going to be available even when nikon releases a newer model . 
7 picture quality is excellent . 
8 battery life is excellent . 
9 3x built-in optical zoom is a lot for this price range . 
10 great price for all the features . 
this camera was affordable , very easy to learn , and produces spectacular images . 
the auto-mode is good enough for most shots but the 4300 also boasts 12 versatile scene modes as well as a manual mode though i admit i have n't played with it too much on manual . 
it 's size also makes it ideal for travel . 
overall the nikon 4300 is a very dependable , robust , and useful little camera . 
awesome camera with huge print quality in a tiny package . 
the same 4mp chip from the 4500 camera , plus a 3x zoom with the ability to expand upon that with extenders , great closeup mode , long lasting rechargable battery , etc etc. 
in my opinion it 's the best camera for the money if you 're looking for something that 's easy to use , small good for travel , and provides excellent , sharp images . 
I've had this beauty for nearly 2 months now and I truely love it.
It has it all.
This is the first phone I know of that has the large bright screen, infrared, bluetooth, USB connector and a speakerphone.
If you are looking for an upgrade, this is definitely the phone for you.
3660 had similar features, but that is big in size.
6600 looks and feels nice.
This one is full of features(has bluetooth).
Especially the LCD is big and the camera quality is among the very best around.
I have set up it's PDA features with avantgo.com where you can download info from sites like weather,mapquest maps/directions into it, which is great.
Using supplied s/w, you can transfer all addresses from a different nokia phone into it.
Goes ~3 days after a charge.
I must add to the dismay/delight of readers this phone is simply the most groundbreaking phone mankind has ever held.
It has raised the bar owing to number of features it offers and the absolute ease of use delight.
1.The Phone has the best keypad any Nokia phone has to offer.
Believe me when I say this I have used and fingered all Nokia phones and the 6600 has the best keypad
I must admit its not the best looking phone ever but then it has this look of static and absolute conviction that looks like everything a phone should be
3. The Nokia 6600 has a brilliant Java interface.
The Phone offers a 32 Mb MMC card and I think that is certainly the most exciting feature.
Capacity is not a problem here.
4. The Build is just right.
The phone is sturdy.
I've dropped it atleast a dozen times to my recolletion and it still works as good as ever.
Its a tough one this unless you wanna drive your car over it.
This isn't the most rugged phone ever but then your not gonna play aeroplane with this,are you.
5.The Camera installed on this phone is awesome.
I click pictures in JPG format and because the phone has a bluetooth device I find it extremely easy to transfer pics to my pc and forth.
The display and brightness on this phone is quite extraordinary.
The use of 65536 (16bit) colors ensures you get your share of animations and icons on your phone
It has great upgradibility.
The log functions helps you track down the incoming , outgoing calls in the most easy of ways.
The handsfree provided by the phone is useful for those who talk on the phone while driving.
This makes for a great phone.
since then, i have not found one major problem with it.
i highly recommend it if you are looking for a phone with great camera quality and/or lots of features you would find in a PDA.
I own this phone for about 6 months now, I have used the following features: bluetooth connection to laptop and desktop for sync contacts and calendars with Outlook, transfer files (movies, songs), I have many movies on it now with a 512MB memory card that it takes.
Handsfree future is good, but not too exciting.
This one has a good looking.
It's oval and... nice.
I like it's shape and it's keypad and joystick.
It's easy to use. Not too small, and not too big.
The screen is quite big (between all handphone), but the just about 65000 color.
Few month ago, it's very popular among my community.
It's good.
:! OK, score 7.0 Oh yes, the newest color of this phone is quite cool.
While this phone obviously doesn't have the same quality construction as Motorola does, the Nokia 6600 is one of the better phones I've used.
What makes it so great is the versatility and the number of features it has.
1) Great audio quality overall.
Handset quality is great, as is the speakerphone quality and the headset audio quality.
A decent camera phone for taking quick pictures, movies, and having general all around fun with.
3) The joystick design they are using on the new Nokias gives you a great degree of control.
4) One nice thing about Nokias is that they have a ton of ring tone and game choices.
If you love your cell phone games or changing your ring tones everyday, Nokia beats everyone else.
5) Bluetooth wireless technology, so that I can transfer data to and from my computer without messing with any cables.
6) The phone is really wide, which seems to be a turnoff for many people, but the phone is actually easier to grip and feel more ergonomic.
I feel much less likely to drop this phone than others, which are actually starting to get too small.
I can tell using the phone that it feels a little flimsier than Motorolas do, but as long as I'm not planning on dropping the phone or running over it with my car it should be just fine.
Other than that it meets or surpasses all of my needs and surely won't disappoint any already established Nokia phone fans.
APPLICATIONS: It has lots of applications and they work very well... when you eventually find where they are and they finally open.
The 6600 has more ameneties than most - World phone, Camera (VGA/zoom/night mode/timer), Video (w/ audio & zoom), Speaker (good sound), Bluetooth, infrared, Modem for computers, electronic wallet, Internet access, Calendar, calculator, converter and more.
DEPENDABILITY: I've seen no glitches.
I've had no problems w/ this phone.
Although it has chubby hips, the device isn't really so big.
Solid, squeak-free, large screen.
MEMORY/STORAGE - Seemingly boundless.
First of all, the phone houses a great deal of memory for multiple videos, sound clips, photos, texts, etc.
Secondly, all info can be sent to a computer and w/o the hassle of USB wires.
The 6600 (T-Mobile) is the true 'world phone' in that it has the mhz to operate around the globe, including New Zealand and Australia (900) whereas the  6620 (available from Cingular) replaces it w/ 800mhz (some refer to as 850).
The latter will provide better coverage in more remote areas of The States but still operates in many countries, excluding New Zealand and Australia.
As the 6600 uses 900mhz, it operates in more countries than the 6620.
The battery life is less than stellar, but it charges w/ the quickness.
Remember, this phone uses an operating system - Symbian... and it's feature-rich w/ 65k colors.
It films 10 second video, for crying out loud.
There are number of downloads needed/available for this phone & they will be texted to you at no cost.
A Sony Ericcson may be the phone for you... but good luck finding one w/ all the features & such a competitive price.
Despite a critical start, this phone deserves four stars because it accomplishes what it sets out to do (which is pretty lofty)... does more than most... does it well... is dependable.
This phone is one of the best I've ever used.
It has everything I needed: bluetooth, infrared, support for MMC, camera, and a good operating system with lots of supporting software.
I would have given this phone 5 stars if it wasn't for the fact that I would rather use my 3330 to do all the most common things you do with a phone.
The plusses are the features, look, good signal and battery life, memory size and robustness.
The camera and video functionality is decent, I can't see myself wasting my time with it, but some people will.
this is a great phone i have this phone since Feb 04 and i never have any problem at all.
very cool features... great camera with zoom...cool quality pictures... great ringtones... bluetooth feature is great....
This thing does everything but washes your dishes.
I can use it as a modem for my computer, connect with clients and friends, the possibilities are endless.
The ringtones are beautiful, the screen is super high quality.
I do not need to repeat what's great about this phone.
I never had a single problem.
It is Nokia and thus easy to acces the menu options.
High quality video and pictures rock!
3 band and you can just change the SIM card in it to be able to use it in Europe with another service provider.
Bottom line great phone for the time being.
I use a Nokia 6600, it has a great color TFT display and camera equipped with zoom, which complement a built-in video recorder with audio and a RealOne player for playback and streaming of 3GPP-compatible and RealMedia video clips.
Multimedia functions are enhanced by multi-slide MMS messages and a Gallery for organizing digital content captured or downloaded with the phone.
The Nokia 6600 is a decent extension of the smartphone line.
The phone has such advantages as the excellent keypad and display, long rundown time and a good software suite.
In short, the Nokia 6600 is an evolution but not a revolution.
I'm sure you can read the specs above to see everything it does, but for me the best thing is that I can easily check my email, movie times, news, or any website with this phone.
You can take pic of your friends and the picture will pop up when they call.
Give each friend a different ringtone.
Get great themes and wallpapers for this phone and many many polyphonic rings.
A huge beautiful color screen which can not been scratched at all even with the rough handling i give it.
Nokia makes great phones, and this one is the cream of the crop.
Best phone i've ever owned, period.
Frankly, I think this is one of the niftiest pieces of hardware I've ever used.
It is slow to initially start up, but once it's turned on, I've never had any complaints about the speed.
Everything, so far, has worked flawlessly.
All at the same time, and all without a hitch.
I think the interface is great.
I actually purchased two phones recently (this one at the new Blackberry phone), and this one is far superior (IMHO).
I love the features, the interface, the size (the screen is a delight), the camera (though I admit I'm not much of a camera user -- so just a toy for me), the internet connectivity, the quality, etc.
If I had to do it over, I wouldn't buy anything else.
UPSIDE: This one, like most Nokias, receives a consistently strong signal (I've tried some Samsung and Sony Ericsson models which were very weak on the reception front).
I love the Bluetooth; easy to use with a wireless Jabra headset.
Photos are pretty darned good!
Probably a great phone overall, and perhaps mine just has bugs.
With one of the most intuitive user-interfaces around, seamless bluetooth sync with Microsoft Outlook, support for thousands of applications for the Symbian platform which this phone runs on (I own the IR Remote, ICQ and a few others), the Nokia 6600 is all of the above - one of the few phones from T-Mobile that can claim such a distinction.
Ive had this phone for a year now - and its the best phone I have owned.
This may be a really cool phone, but it's not worth it with T-Mobile.
This phone is fantastic.
Great reception, visibility and interface (may be complicated by others).
I highly recommend this phone.
I had a Sony ericsson T610 before this and the T610 is far inferior.
Im able to keep my phone on for about a week (mostly stand by) to three days (regular use)
but this by far is the best phone out there right now!
i have a hard time using other phones with smaller screens!!!
the pics can be touched up in photoshop, and be printed at 4x6 and they look great!
i also use the phone as my modem via bluetooth to my Apple powerbook!
The speed is the same as dail up, where i live we do not have wifi everywhere so this is my version of it until we catch up.
The phone itself is pretty nice.
Camera quality isn't bad for the low resolution.
This phone has a nice blend of features without going overboard.
I was looking for a phone which synced with Mac OSX using Bluetooth, had decent battery life, could check email, had good reception, nice screen size and was durable (I break often break small gadgets)
The interface is simple to use.
I have a couple hundred contacts and the menu loads within a few seconds, no big deal.
I did notice if you turn the phone on and off the OS takes a bit to load up and initially the menus are slower but once the phone has been on and booted up the menus are reasonably quicker.
The camera is adequate and if I want high-res photos I'll use my digital camera instead.
On the T-Mobile service I was able to take pics as we drove across I-70 and email them to family & friends once we reached a T-Mobile tzone (usually a major city).
Outside of the T-Mobile service area the phone seamlessly jumped onto AT&T Wireless and various other services where the T-Mobile service was unavailable.
As I drove across the country I lost reception only in eastern Kentucky's mountains.
Along the way we compared it to my wife's T720i and the 6600 was superior in terms of battery life, connectivity bars and features.
For those Mac OSX users out there, iSync works fairly well.
And Bluetooth does not drain the battery as quick as I thought it would, I usually can go 1.5 days with Bluetooth on along with making calls before I need a full recharge.
With Bluetooth off the phone last almost twice as long.
The nokia 6600 is a great phone, good games, good camera.
The voice recorders good, but you can't record songs off the radio for ring tones.
The games are decent, but u only get 2 to start off with.
But you can download some really good ones like pac-man or mafia wars.
Overall the phones fantastic, and I would have given it 5 stars, but its not perfect.
The battery on mine lasts 2 days if I don't play games that much, and it only takes 90 mins to charge from flat.
This phone has the best battery, it lasts longer then my old 3210
I got a 1GB MMC upgrade for this phone and now I can:
1. Record around 1 hour of video with Phillips Camcorder Pro.
2. Take around 10,000 640x480 pictures.
3. Play Java games on it.
4. Play N-Gage games on it.
5. Check traffic411.com for LA traffic on the 405.
6. Play Gameboy Color games on it with GoBoy.
7. Have a good chunk of my small MP3 to listen through the speaker phone.
8. Connected the phone to my tablet pc and now can access company VPN at 56k speed via bluetooth.
Clear the call logs once in a while to speed up the phone people!!!
As for bluetooth, no problems at all.
I've connected the phone with two laptops and a iPaq 4155.
Very simple and painless.
This is the first cell phone I've owned, and overall, I am quite pleased with it.
Among my requirments for a phone were: good screen, decent camera, bluetooth, and GPRS support.
The 6600 was the best phone I could find with these options that I could get with t-mobile.
One primary reason for getting a cell phone was so that I could use it as an internet connection for my laptop running linux, where softmodem drivers are hard to find, and don't work very well.
If you are using Linux, and you want to use GPRS to connect to the net, I suggest this phone along with a Belkin USB Bluetooth adapter.
I have really enjoyed the camera on this phone.
And the phone has a very cool feature wich allows you to send images via a normal POP3/SMTP e-mail account.
I will also say that setting up the e-mail account was very simple and straight-forward, although you do need an external SMTP server to use.
The phone can use any MIDI audio file as a ringtone.
Which is really nice because you can get pretty much any piece of music in MIDI format for free on the net.
You can use the OBEX File Transfer service with bluetooth from linux (KDE-bluetooth provieds a nice intergration into Konqueror for this) for sending files to the phone.
The fact that you can assign ringtones to people and/or groups is really cool.
I really dislike holding a phone to my ear, and I've found the Freespeak to be very comfortable and easy to use with this phone.
But if you use all bluetooth accessories, as I do, its really not an issue.
All in all, this is a great phone.
Especially for the price amazon gives it at (I was unable to get mine through amazon due to some credit complications).
If you use linux and want GRPS and/or want to use a handsfree bluetooth device, and want a decent camera -- this is the phone for you.
I really love this phone...
you actually can talk to a real person for support in under an hour!).
Have had the Nokia 6600 for a year now and am generally very happy with it and with T-Mobile.
It offers way more features than I need but the ones I use work well.
I almost always get a good strong signal, even in fairly remote areas here in the southwest.
The sound quality is excellent and the speaker phone couldn't be easier to use.
I like the size and shape.
It fits comfortably in my hand and pocket.
It also works just fine for international calls.
It's a bit pricey to call home from other countries but the instant messaging to and from covered countries in Europe are quite reasonable.
It's really well made and has survived sliding across floors and pavement without a scratch.
I've had nothing but good luck with T-Mobile.
Their customer service agents are always prompt and polite and my service is terrific.
I never get dropped calls.
I recommend T-Mobile and the Nokia 6600 without reservation.
The Nokia 660 runs the Symbian OS, which works pretty well for most standard phone fare, most of the stuff is not that intuitive, but if you actually learn how to use it all, there's plenty of neat tie-ins.
I've had this phone for almost a year now and it has been nothing but great to use.
I can connect to my computer via bluetooth to transfer images, calender events, contacts and anything else.
Another great feature for me anyway is the ability to load .wav sounds as ringers.
This way I never have to be ripped off by the carrier for stupid ringtones, I can get whatever I want.
Other than that, the simbian series 60 OS is great and offers lots of proprietary software that will work on your phone if you're willing to hunt for it.
Initially these phones were fun to play with some of the cool features like the speaker phone, web browser and ofcourse the built in camera.
The good:  1) Large LCD screen, colorful display, good resolution.
2) Nice features, like web browser, camera, video recorder, speaker phone (very usefully), clear voice reception.
3) Joy stick for eazy navigation, 35Mb memory card to store the pictures and stuff.
3) Joy stick for eazy navigation, 35Mb memory card to store the pictures and stuff.
The bottom line is "Phone is cool one - only for the moment, as its the latest phone in the market and has all the new features, but this will soon be displaced by upcoming newer phones".
if you are looking for a phone to integrate as easily as the sonyericsson phones with iSync, i say stick with a sonyericsson.
It is a multifunction phone, reception quality is better than the 610.
speaker phone quality is good, and poping in a 512mb MMC card, it rocks !
putting in MP3 player, lots of games and application to download.
I got this phone yesterday and didn't find any problems with it yet.
Picture and video quality is ok.
Love the speaker phone.
INCREDIBLE MEMORY!
Aside from a 6MB++ built-in phone memory, there's a 32MB MMC card that goes with it!
Picture quality's great for still and video with sound.
you can record your voice and turn it into a ringtone.
N6600 supports midi, wav, amr, mp3 etc.
it has a handsfree loudspeaker, conference and transfer!
I love this phone.
This phone is one of the milestones in the history of the cellular phones.
Supporting an operating system, Symbian OS, you can download and run a lot of programs on this phone.
You can turn this phone into a gaming machine, a camcorder or a digital camera, an mp3-player, a movie viewer, a voice recorder, a personal secretary, a GPS map browser, a book, a multifunction remote controller, practically everything that you can do with the computer, plus it is a phone(!!) and also you can carry it in your pocket :).
Many of these programs are shareware, some can be purchased by paying a little bit of bucks.
It uses the extendable MMC memory, it is perfect for storing videos, pictures and mp3s.
Its nice look is also a plus.
And also, since it is tri band and since it uses SIM-card, you can just use it in Europe and many other parts of the world, wherever GSM exists.
I am just in love with this phone, especially after using a more primitve phone about 3 years.
there is much which has been said in other reviews about the features of this phone , it is a great phone , mine worked without any problems right out of the box . 
i have had the phone for 1 week , the signal quality has been great in the detroit area ( suburbs ) and in my recent road trip between detroit and northern kentucky ( cincinnati ) i experienced perfect signal and reception along i-75 , far superior to at &#38; t 's which does not work along several long stretches on that same route . 
my favorite features , although there are many , are the speaker phone , the radio and the infrared . 
the speaker phone is very functional and i use it in the car , very audible even with freeway noise . 
the infrared is a blessing if you have a previous nokia and want to transfer your old phone book to this phone , saved me hours of re-entering my numbers . 
here 's the brief synopsis : the phone is tiny , cute , feels kind of " plastic-like " ( as if it might break ) , but seems pretty sturdy . 
it has lots of little cute features , my favorite being the games and the pim ( personal information manager -- i.e. organizer ) , and the radio ! 
on the up-side , the phone has amazing battery life . 
i do like this phone overall ( would give it a 3.5 ) , but unforutnately , i am returning it . 
in all fairness , customer reps are very nice , and they ( most of them ) try hard to answer your questions . 
t-mobile is trying very hard , and again -- they do have pretty good csr 's . 
i 'm staying with sprint , and though i fear that their csr is n't nearly as good as t-mobile 's , the clarity of their reception is exceptional . 
while i like the performance of the phone in every regard , i would buy another one solely upon the apparent indestructibility of it . 
i highly recommend a nokia 6610 . 
no other color phone has the combination of features that the 6610 offers . 
from the speakerphone that can be used up to 15 feet away with clarity , to the downloadable poly-graphic megatones that adds a personal touch to this nifty phone . 
whether you 're taking a brisk jog , waiting for a bus or just having lunch at the park , you 'll be glad you had the fm radio . 
i treat the battery well and it has lasted . 
overall this has been my favorite phone that i have owned . 
it has a nice color screen . 
it is small . 
t-mobile was a pretty good server . 
while i had the phone , the positive features were : good sound quality and an excellent fm phone and earpiece . 
the two biggest things is the excellent working speakerphone " unlike the nokia 3650 " and the superb reception nokia is known for in the gsm phones they make ... 
this phone is a winner ... 
anything this phone does , it does perfectly . 
the speakerphone , the radio , all features work perfectly . 
this phone has a very cool and useful feature -- the speakerphone . 
as said before this works perfectly . 
you can adjust the volume to be heard anywhere or so that it does n't make that big of a disturbance . 
the person on the other end of the call can hear you perfectly . 
you can be up to about 3 feet away from it and it will still work perfectly . 
this phone is one of the few phones that have an fm radio tuner built in . 
this radio receives fairly decent reception but not nearly as good as a normal radio , but as long as the stations are coming in clearly the phone 's radio should work perfectly . 
i bought this phone for my trip to south africa and it worked almost perfectly . 
anywhere i went in south africa this phone received full bar reception . 
another benefit of this phone is that it is truly an international phone ; the 6610 is sold in almost everywhere in the world . 
this means that there is a good chance that this phone will not break easily like typical american phones . 
when you put this phone in your pocket you forget it is there ; it is unbelievably small and oh , so light . 
this is a benefit for many reasons ; one being just for appearance , your pants wo n't be bulging with this phone in your pocket . 
the battery life on this phone is surreal . 
i 've used the speakerphone for almost two hours once and the battery did not even go down one single bar . 
it is amazing that the battery lasts so long when the phone is so small and light . 
this phone has many other features , ir , ; just to name one , the features above i view as the most beneficial . 
overall , i highly recommend this phone . 
it is a perfect phone in such a small and appealing package . 
size - extremely small and convenient will fit in your pocket and not bother you . 
sound - excellent polyphonic ringing tones are very nice ( check cons ) it also doubles as a radio , which is a nice feature when you are bored . 
speakerphone - loud and clear has some nice extra features like currency converter and a stopwatch . 
surfing the web on it is nice as well , i just wish there were more wap pages available . 
nice little phone ... light compact . . 
although the nokia 6610 is a little short on the features department , it is an outstanding piece of hardware for doing what it was primarily meant to do : to be a wireless telephone . 
the reception and sound quality are top-notch . 
i like the size and weight of this little critter . 
i am able to carry it close to my body , in places where other phones are not so easily concealed . 
the screen is bright , easy to see in the daylight , with nice colors . 
it receives very nice mms pictures from other gsm phones . 
but , then again , the ringer can be so loud that i heard it ringing inside my office , when i was already out on the street .. . 
- light , compact design 
- solid , high-quality construction 
- well-backlit keypad 
- outstanding signal reception 
- excellent sound quality 
- bright , visible screen 
- speakerphone 
- very long-lasting battery life 
one of the best cell phones i have ever used to-date . 
i like the speakphone function a lot . 
i am very pleased with its quality and durability . 
i like the automatic key lock function . 
the phone is very light weight . 
the screen is bright and ring tones are unlimited . 
the fm radio is cool . 
while going for a cellphone , i was fully determined to buy a nokia only as it is the best in cellphones . 
and really this is the best phone one could have . 
it has all the features one would need in a cellphone . 
it is lightweight , sleek and attractive . 
this phone is very user-friendly , easy to manipulate &#38; very convenient to scroll in menu etc . 
it has fm radio option and i can listen to music anytime . 
its speakerphone option allows us to do long talks conveniently , lying on bed &#38; phone lying by your pillowside . 
it comes equipped with lot of wallpapers and polyphonic sweet tunes . 
i am enjoying my phone a lot .... 
small size . 
i love the fact i can carry it in my shirt or pants pocket and forget about it . 
color screen is good . 
it has lots of features such as the calendar which works like my outlook calendar . 
the keys are laid out normal so there is no guessing . 
navigating through the menus is super easy , especially if you have owned a previous model nokia phone . 
battery life is very good , i use it every day and i have to charge it every 5 or 6 days or so . 
nokias have always had good sound quality and this is no exception . 
the loud speaker function on the 6610 is great because you do n't need to put your phone right next to your ear to talk . 
i like my phones to be small so i can fit it in my pockets . 
overall this is a slightly better than average phone . 
this is the best phone i have seen . 
the phones are awesome . 
we hardly ever have to charge them , get great reception ( live in chicago ) , and the customization and applications are awesome . 
you can do * so * much more with the pc suite , i.e. free ringtones from midi files , free graphics from any picture on your computer , and if you know how to program jme you can even make your own apps / games . 
the phone 's sound quality is great ( turn up the volume if its too quiet , people , this thing will get loud ) i dont have any complaints about this phone and the only thing that i miss from my 8290 is voice dialing . 
i bought this slick phone and i am very happy with it . 
nice and small and excellent when it comes to downloading games , graphics and ringtones from www.crazycellphone.com 
i just purchased this phone and i think this is the coolest phone i ever had . 
the features are really cool like the radio . 
the first night i got this phone i put it next to me when i went to bed just to listen to my favorite music station and the handset itself doesnt weight anything its too light and feel so comfy with it . 
technology wise , i think this is awesome plus the speaker makes it even great ! ! ! ! i love this phone ! ! ! 
for a specific location , i still think its a great phone . 
this really is a great little phone ; its got nice features , a beatiful screen , great ergonomics , and its tiny ! 
this phone won me over , and a big seller was the size ; it fits nicely into any pocket without falling out . 
nokia was my first nonflip phone , and i 'm glad i decided to go with them . 
first of all , my calls were loud and clear , unlike with sprint . 
i could make phone calls from locations i previously could not ( like my apartment ) . 
the phone is small , light , and very attractive . 
the battery life is amazing . 
the color screen is a plus , as are the polyphonic ringtones . 
i 'm not one who uses web browsing , so this phone easily met and surpassed my needs . 
i highly recommend this phone to anyone . 
it is a great phone , if you are traveling all over the world , packed with wonderful features . 
this is a very light phone - a little less than 3 oz , with long battery life ( not as long as the new polymer technology ) . 
the hands-free speakerphone is quite powerful ( like the motorola phone , i used to own ) . 
i simply love this feature . 
in addition it comes with a sleek and powerful headset . 
the built in fm radio is excellent for people traveling by public transport . 
the pc sync feature is superb that comes with nokia pc suite software ( with data cable or infrared port or bluetooth ) . 
additionally , it has more fun stuff like more tones , wallpapers , screensaver , stop clock , alarm , java applications ( chess , currency converter etc. ) 
the mobile text messaging , chat , picture sharing etc. other nicities , that you would enjoy . 
the mms technology is very well integrated with this phone , which you will enjoy . 
i can recommend this phone to anyone , anytime . 
not only is it the perfect size ( not too small , not too large ) , it also has all the features a high-tech phone user would want . 
in true nokia style , the phone is simple to use and despite its delicate appearance , this little guy is as durable as other nokias i have owned . 
the phone book is very user-friendly and the speakerphone is excellent . 
even better , with the optional headset you can listen to music over the integrated radio . 
however , the battery life is good enough you should n't be overly concerned with turning this phone off . 
overall this is the best phone i have ever owned . 
nokia does not disappoint in this model . 
it has great battery life , fm radio , excellent signal , hands free speakerphone ( which i have to say is probably my favorite function ) and downloadable java apps . 
great phone .. . 
great features .. . 
i did a ton of research and settled on this phone because of the small size , speakerphone option , great priced calling plan and access to my corporate email . 
i have had no problems with the phone . 
great phone , i 'd buy another . 
excellent phone , the phone looks much better than what u see in the pictures . 
overall an excellent phone . 
the service from t-mobile is very good too . 
great phone , easy to use , excellent network , no regrets ! ! ! 
i purchased this phone for just 50 $ and there is no end to what i can do with it . 
nokia and t-mobile really teamed up well on this baby . 
service is great as far as i can tell , features work like a charm , ringtones are high quality if you buy them from t-mobile and aim is great . 
this is probably your best bet if you are looking for a phone in this price range , or like me , do not have the patience to deal with annoying flip phones . 
1 month , no problems , great phone i 'm very pleased with my 6610 phone . 
yes , the features are numerous . 
the speakerphone works better than any speakerphone i 've ever had . 
the sound quality is excellent , except , maybe a * tad * too quiet at times when there are quieter talkers on the other end of the line . 
the included earpiece is very comfortable and easy to use . 
i have not had any distortion problems with this phone and am more pleased with this phone than any i 've used before . 
first let me say that it is much smaller than it looks on the web and it also looks better . 
the radio feature has superb sound quality . 
it has a classic design yet looks hip . 
it is extremely light and dissapears in your pocket . 
the battery is alot better than most of the phones out there . 
this phone is great as a whole and is not like others with one or two good qualities . 
it does well in all aspects of internet browsing . 
battery life is good for a phone of this size . 
but anyway , the only thing you should really look at here is the fact that the phone does have voice dialing . 
great screen and great sound . 
the 6610 excels as a cell phone , thank god . 
the voice quality is very good , and it gets great reception ( that is , in places where you get t-mobile coverage , which is not that good ; see below ) . 
the color screen makes this free-after-rebates phone shine bright , and commands are very responsive . 
other than that , this is a perfect phone for those of us with no patience for flips . 
the nokia 6610 is a relatively new phone , and what a great phone it is . 
after using it , i found the size to be perfect for carrying in a pocket . 
it is just a tad small to hold to your ear with your shoulder , but that is solved with the very comfortable handsfree ear-piece which is included . 
when i turned the phone on , the first thing that hit me is how good the screen is . 
the resolution is very good and the colors are bright and even changeable ! 
the ringtones included are awesome , and did i mention they were polyphonic ? 
you can also assign special rings and graphics to special people when they call . 
the phone also sports an image gallery ( with option camera attachment ) , a calendar / organizer , alarm clock with snooze , fm radio ( way cool , even if it is just through an ear-peice ) , games , java applications and gprs high-speed internet connection . 
all my questions or problems have been quickly and satisfactorily resolved . 
the rate plans are also very good , at least for me . 
this phone is highly recommended otherwise . 
nokia makes a great phone , that 's clear . 
with all its complicated features , the menus are easily accessible and the quality of the features is great . 
this phone is good with a huge array of features built into it . 
the design is sleek and the color screen has good resolution . 
it is very light weight and has a good signal strength . 
but , i would definately recommend this phone . 
it is crystal clear . 
this is one of the nicest phones nokia has made . 
It can not be the computer or the owner, since I purchased McAfee Anti-Virus 8 and it installs and works fine with no problems.
NIS 2003 worked like a charm last year.
But that is good for me because Symantec softwares are a bit hard to master for me who are not savvy on computers.
I'm not sure why all the bad reviews, my computer isn't especially slowed down and I have Win'98.
Sure, it slows it down a little, but that's expected.
Perhaps Semantic could work out the efficiency a little, but these reviews are highly exagerated... I would ask what else these people are running on their computers(?)
This is the fourth version of SystemWorks and the second version of Internet Security that I have used and it has always been a favorite.
Once installed, however, some of the functions do work OK (Disk Doctor, One Button Checkup, and WinDoctor).
These tasks are faster and easier than in prior versions, and I found the menu to be much more navigable.
Their website had a download that helped remove those, although I had to manually remove a good number of files from the "Programs" directory.
Norton's memory usage on systems with 512 MB is very low.
I just got an older 866 Mhz system with 512 PC 133 RAM and it also runs fine on that.
Both the antivirus and firewall are integrated into one piece of software and they update together.
You won't need to update your firewall and antivirus separately or install two disks.
The best part of the firewall is the visual backtracking.
We were able to obtain a Norton Corporate Edition of Antivirus only (no firewall or utilities) and so far it's great.
 I've used the Corporate edition at work without any problems ever.
By the way, I use the Norton 2003 Corporate at work with absolutely no trouble.
Likewise, I've heard Norton 2004 PROFESSIONAL version is fine too.
I've been using NIS 2004 for about 2 months and it works well.
Norton pops up a window about the intrusions and gives me as much detail as possible about where the intrusion is coming from.
The popup blocker and anti-spam are bonuses.
I didn't have any major problems installing this software.
Anyhow, this software is working fine and no problems since I installed it two weeks ago.
Mine installed no problem (but I DID uninstall my Norton Anti-Virus 2002 & Personal Firewall 2002 first).
Seems to work great.
This did manage to cut the number of popups during start-up from 4 down to 2.
While it didn't have all the features I would have liked, it was better than anything else I could find at the time.
Also, with one click you can help train your spam killer.
And the firewall came with a wizard which made it effortless to configure it to my LAN.
It's a highly rated, KICK ASS firewall program that's bundled with the venerable Norton AntiVirus, plus extras (like Norton AntiSpam & Norton Parental Control) that make this security suite a must-have for people who have broadband internet access.
Luckly,with 3 rebates this product will cost me nothing! it is indeed worth nothing.
I've tried the free versions of zone alarm and the free version of sygate and they both have a nice and easy installation and work great!.
The only free help you get is in renewing your subscription!
The product has worked perfectly for me on my XP.
No more banner ads, pop-ups, and the reliable antivirus.
I work on word, explorer, netscape, acrobat reader, photoshop at same time (meaning using a lot of memory), but still dont see a problem with computer (getting slow or crashing).
This product is way cooler than anything Ive used before (PcCillins and McCafees and Norton Antivirus alone).
5 stars all the way!
All in all it hasn't been a bad product.
I've owned many Norton products in my time, and for the most part, I've been pleased with their performance.
This is also the case with NIS 2004.
I upgraded from NIS 2003, and the change in performance has not been noticeable.
On the contrary, I'm quite pleased with my upgrade.
It works better and has more useful features than NIS 2003.
The program is fully featured, with much of what you'd want from a security program --
The installation, set-up, and operating interfaces are well organized and intuitive and the email spam component works well.
PIII 1Ghz 512MB RDRAM Windows XP Pro 80GB HD  I was able to Uninstall NIS 2003 and Install NIS 2004 with no trouble.
I installed, activated and registered NIS 2004 without issue.
So far, the Anti-Spam feature seems to be very good.
I downloaded a trial version of Computer Associates EZ Firewall and Antivirus and fell in love with a computer security system all over again.
I did not have any of the installation problems that people highlighted here.
Their products have been great and have saved my bacon on numerous occasions.
i 've had the player for about 2 years now and it still performs nicely
the nomad jukebox zen xtra is a very good mp3 player
i thought this was the ultimate phone when it comes to basic features 
While it has a rather effective firewall, and comes with Norton Antivirus (which I'm actually rather fond of)
set up was easy and we enjoyed it for a week . 
iPod is brilliant
I like the fact that it IS EASY to use with limited networking experience 
This is a good product 
This device looks pretty nice






